“Oh good.” Her mind was heady as the protester tried to get in a word edgewise. Between the chit chat and the protester’s interjections, she had trouble making sense of the pictures. Then it dawned on her: they were of fetuses.
hubby found a lot that would do...
With all the different diet plans and exercising options available, it could be overpowering looking to discover the greatest route. Take some time to study the next paragraphs just before diving into weight reduction, and allow this advice make the process a bit less complicated.
What was Joshua going through, after Moses’ death? Behind him – millions of Israelis, in front of him – the Jordan River and impregnable walls of Jericho …
No one questions anything. No one seems to be willing to fight for anything. They are afraid of authority. When the cops defend the corporations and the wealthy by any means when the majority have legitimate grievances, people cower.
And hey, everybody! Can we please note the word INTERCESSION, right in the prayer, there? Thanks.
As a twelve-minute long piece, this song is in constant flux, while all carrying an aural tone that is incredibly suggestive of being underwater. Next time I'm in my bathysphere I'll have to remember to listen to this album on my iPod. The whole band stars throughout, as Frank and Steve Vai turn in some gorgeous guitar solos (I'm not much of a guitarist to be able to tell you which solo belongs to which player, all I know is they sound great), Scott Thunes adding some great pulse on bass, especially from 2:10 to the 3:15 mark, the synths of Tommy Mars and Bobby Martin add ambiance - don't miss that SICK arpeggiated run they do right before the song's end at 11:40, and the percussion section of Ed Mann (who I contend steals the show) on tuned percussion and Chad Wackerman on drums, playing better than he ever would on later FZ releases - in my opinion. Then again, he was filling some mighty shoes, and as one of my Zappa buddies pointed out, who knows what sort of feel FZ asked Chad to play? Maybe he wanted him to keep it relatively simple.
Very simply, Intellect is our best stat. I see these as three categories: Intellect is in a class by itself. It’s the best. Spirit/Hit is also in a class by itself, because its value is necessary until you hit the cap, and then it’s useless.
What I’m about to write is rather controversial but let it be known that I’m not against any minority group (for I myself am a minority in the US), but this is to bring out the ugly side of this tragedy in U.S. history.
Our sweet neighbor is doing a neighborhood Easter Egg hunt for all of the kid’s in the surrounding block. Prior to my adoption, prior to the Earthquake, prior to them coming home, this was the stuff of which my adoption daydreams set their stars.
What I don’t get is why your dead battery is somehow my problem.
The Buddhist view is compatible with all three of those statements – or at least has things in common with each of them; but differs also in a seemingly small but significant way. It is elegant, simple and radical in its scope and implications. The proposition put forward by Buddhism is that there is already in reality no separation between this 'me' and the rest of the universe. Our perception of duality, of 'me' versus 'you' or 'it', is the result of millenia of conditioned habituation to the notion of a separate egoic self, and our enormous efforts to preserve and defend our identity as this separate 'self'.
We concluder there could have been no Shock and Awe or war of occupation in Iraq were it not for the Christian Zionists’ zealous campaign to destroy Muslim nations. The now publicly acknowledged War on Islam is in fact already 17 years old. Project Strait Gate was started to challenge it in its very lair. Jesus and his disciples took their arguments to the temple and the synagogues. We are doing the same.
Yes it's Janet Jackson's Control video!! As a teenager, I WORE this cassette out!! I admit tried to wear the black suits and even the key in my earring...didn't quite pull it off though, lol. (I have the pics to prove it...) Anyway, I still have this song in rotation in my car...
The more I think about the patterns that I fall into, and the circles that I get stuck in, I see that even though I set goals and seem to be taking action towards them, not a huge amount changes in my life at a rapid rate.
which is what people say about me too
I AM GETTING WIFI ON MARCH 5! MARK THE DATE! MUCH MORE BLOGS WILL BE COMING!! THANKS TO THAT! It is from AT&T. yahoooo!! I am full of energy and hyper. I just ate some kit kats. yum yum yum YUMMY! haha, lets get real. Hashtag #Real Talk Braa! haha. you know what it is if you twitter.
Semantic meanings get at but a fraction of the meaning of the full, mediated nature of language. Until I understood this, I could not understand the centrality of calligraphy and recitation for an understanding of Islam, or of a stroll through temple gardens in Kyoto as “telling” me something about the Zen or Jodo traditions. McLuhan never wrote about calligraphy or gardens, so far as I’ve seen, but his perspectives allowed me to think beyond the symbols and semantics. As he discusses a type of “analogical thinking” that is useful for the relations between religion and media, it all “begins in the senses and is derailed by concepts or ideas.”
. Envelope
.o.j. cobain
1/4 cup olive oil
Now when we look at the short flap wing, the difference between open and closed is far more noticeable, as pretty much only the thickness of the wing profile is presented to the airflow. The challenge for the teams is produce a short flap wing, which still produces the level of downforce of the large flap wing. Also in creating this downforce, the wing must not stall or separate. As the reason for the slot in wings to reduce the airflow separating off the underside of the wing. Moving this slot rearward, by using a shorter flap, is likely to induce this sort of separation.
As nine out of ten nutritionists, and economists, predicted, the RBA holds rates today.
“It’s a freaking dress!”
I love the thickness of the marble on the island ... especially the contrast between the dark cabinets and the rest of the creamy white Kitchen. Too bad we don't have room in our kitchen for an island ... otherwise I would have totally went with 2 colors for the cabinets.
The water is so piping hot
I'm being naughty this cycle, and I am totally refilled my Clomid presctiption from last Spring/Summer without teling my doctor. So hopefully I don't get OHSS and die or anything.
8. Traveling: I had so many adventures last year traveling inside and outside of China and I am looking forward to the new places we will explore this year. Sometimes trains can be crowded, and tickets hard to buy-but no matter what we always have a great time and some awesome stories afterwards.
King: Do you know your punishment little one?
This is not a colour (or style) I would choose to wear myself (just a tad bright). But I do recall that both my elder sisters would have worn something like it for formal occasions at the time. The thickness of the fabric surprised me though.
Adieu, and take thy praise with thee to heaven!
Let's just remember where Brian Braddock was, the time he last appeared in print.
Dr. Wyatt is a family physician who has spent much of her twenty-five-year career as a hospice medical director. The author of What Really Matters: 7 Lessons for Living from the Stories of the Dying (Select Books, 2012), Dr. Wyatt has lectured and written extensively on end-of-life issues with an emphasis on the spiritual aspect of illness and dying. To learn more, go to www.karenwyattmd.com.
And an aching in me
10am-6 eggs, 2 sausage patties, 4 strawberries
Q. We hear of the subsidy probe report, do you think the government can bring the culprits to justice?
Physicians Formula Healthy Wear Bronzer SPF50 (applied to contour cheeks)
Installation of was suspended (administration).
I recognized his Mackintosh tartan because I’d passed the overnight train ride from Edinburgh learning about highland clans. His kilt was weighted down with small metal balls sewn into the hem so it wouldn’t float on the surface of the water and cause a stir. He fished a lot and always in his kilt. The red, green and white lines of the fabric intersected hypnotically in the bright sun.
Seldom, has the political bias and commonality of purpose of our nation's establishment and its media been so clearly exposed. They are all, every one of them branches of the same poisonous tree which as spent a quarter of a century, or more. suppressing and vilifying any organisation which has attempted to stand up in defence of the native population of Britain, and they are now furiously spitting blood in their failure to destroy the latest threat to their mission.
Kata sees the bailiff approaching and stands up. It’s time for their case. The judge glances through the papers and then sternly warns them about proselytizing. He surprises everyone, however, by dropping all charges against the two Christians.
that even
I'd guess that's why they're called 'restraints'.
Babble incoherently at a fellow employee, then ask “Did you get all that?, I don’t want to have to repeat it.”
In this connection, the most painful irony is that the soon to be 35-year old Ms. Rabbani Khar once worked as a model for Revlon; not her hands or legs. Her face.
1. Don’t let senior employees turn into dinosaurs. Require them to learn new technologies, even if they don’t want to.
@Anna: 1 in 100 doesn't sound so rare to me, but I suppose this
Knowing she had that view was also a factor in the success of the orgasm session that followed, I was totally turned on by what I was showing her. In addition, the level of my arousal from three previous sessions last week with no ejaculation also contributed. Lastly was the factor that I was laying back and I could feel her and talk to her but not see her directly; that lack of vision was a means for us to communicate and for me to focus on the sensations I felt and not be distracted by seeing her and reading into what she might be thinking by the expression on her face.
People will ridicule you for failing. Ignore them and focus on the future. Your efforts will eventually pay off. At the end of the day, you can rest knowing that you did your best. Ultimately, that’s what matters the most.
3/4 cup raw tahini
Every American wishes the fair winds blow the Amazon Bound to a solid trade in goals. Klinsmann may also benefit from the wisdom of Goethe. Carve this on the mast – Der Worte sind genug gewechselt, lasst mich auch endlich Taten sehn! (Enough words have been exchanged; now at last let me see some deeds!)
Today i’m stuck to my bed
After carefully placing the festive bunting in just the right place, she had time to check on her reflection.
SCHNEIDER - Weisse
Navy Rear Admiral Mark Montgomery, EUCOM’s deputy commander for plans, policy and strategy, spoke in a similar vein:
The feast of St. Ubaldus is of semi-double rite and its liturigcal colour is white. Today is also the Vigil of the Ascension and the last day, the Wednesday, of the Rogations or Lesser Litanies. Rogation Wednesday is not commemorated in the Office
We've been hanging out with the kids -- she has 4 and I brought my two. We're like the Brady Bunch -- 3 girls and 3 boys. The best part is that they are all 6 and under. Yep, 6 kids ages 6 and under. We've got 6,6,5,3,2, and almost 5 months. Nice relaxing vacation with all those kids right? In reality the kids have been doing really well together.
Last I left off, I was trying to arrange a photo for this page. So let's see how that went......No dice. So......
Wouldn’t you just love to poke in a relationship between two young high schoolers who have a subtle distance between each other? Of course you would. Tsumiki and Io have this subtle distance that anyone would want to jump in between just to bug them. That’s what the other characters are there for. Tsumiki, being a tsundere and all, won’t be honest about her feelings toward Io. Io on the other hand is unaware of Tsumiki’s feelings, hence the subtle distance between the two. Now, let’s watch these two and see what events await them…
Apart from the chic shopping and dining in the area, the Jane is also a block away from the High Line, the old railway recently converted to a brilliant urban walkway. Perfect for your morning stroll or jog, or for picking up a coffee at the stall along the way.
All right? Thank you very much, everybody.
The wearing of clothing is, on top of this, a personal choice. What right does France or anyone in the world have to impose their values on someone else? Impose their choices on anyone else? I don’t see anyone complaining of Sikh turbans, or even the small swords that devout Sikhs carry on their person, as part of their religion. Surely that’s more of a threat than anything – to go around armed? So why the double standards?
It will be in the valley of love and delight.
Lots of changes for me in relation to my work life. As I'm part of the Public Health Preparedness team, I've taken some FEMA courses to help with Emergency Response, which is something I've always been interested in helping with natural disasters and pandemics.
Welcome to MY world...
But I almost got caught and/or killed by a flying machine before that, I am not sure what the flying machines would do to people, and I did not want to find out; somehow I escaped the flying machine, probably because so many other people were running around for it to capture and/or kill.
Know him well and anticipate his response. Will he be flawed, awed, dumbstruck, teary? Have a few different scenarios play out in your head beforehand as it could be any of the above.
I get inspired by my kids, by the headlines, by my memories, and by issues that are important to me.
Charles VII at the Homes of His Great Vassals (Charles VII chez ses grands vassaux, 1831) – drama, adapted for the opera The Saracen by Russian composer César Cui
Happy 2012! I'm back from some time off from blogging, and ready to start a new year. We had a wonderful holiday break, and spent some time with out-of-town family members who were able to stay a few extra days for some extra fun and after-holiday shopping (well, I guess that qualifies as "fun," too!). Slowly but surely the house is getting back to "normal"...this weekend the last of the holiday decor is going back up in the attic for another year.
- As the challenges are sponsored by the great MAGNOLIA for all the generous secret prizes, your main stamp image has to be Magnolia.
Addison: Addison has a busy day, delivering multiple babies throughout the hour. She also dispense worldly words of wisdom to Elise, Amelia, and Jake. When the latter and she kiss in his office, while she’s aforementioned comforting him, she admits that he’s no longer her doctor because she’s giving up on having a baby. But she’s also not ready to jump in bed with Jake, opting to take it slow after their kiss. At home, Sam pays her a visit and they talk about nothing makes sense. Except of course, for the two of them together, and then he kisses her. And I slam my head on the keyboard begging for the lambs to stop screaming… No #Addisam! I beg of you Shonda Rhimes! But before it goes any further, they’re interrupted by a call on Addison’s phone. She races to the hospital where she sees her social worker (played by the awesome Aloma Wright). After giving up all hope, it seems a birth mother has chosen Addison to adopt her baby. And who is the birth mother? Why it’s Judy, the birth Addison had Amelia witness earlier in the hour! (And does anyone know the name of the actress that played Judy? I couldn’t find it anywhere! ) So while we’ll get to meet Baby Boy Montgomery (to be named Henry- not Captain, per the previews) a bit more next week, Addison finally got her baby after five seasons. Does this mean no nursery for Amelia?
It found vitamin D deficiency was an independent risk factor, even after adjusting for others, such as weight and physical activity.
OHIO! And Florida! And Virginia!
Now for the gory details. (Gentlemen, you may want to move on at this point.)
For Alexander, in writing the villian it's "more interesting to have a villain who's been pushed and pushed. You get a reader not to sympathize, but to understand."
My granny's spare room was fascinating to me. The 70s style garish yellow, orange and brown chrysanthemum wallpaper wasn't like anything I had seen before. My mum's walls at home were all white, my granny's were psychedelic.
We’re fans of economical casts; series that belt out dozens of people to keep track of can be overwhelming. Which is why we’re glad Nazo no Kanojo X is focusing on a relatively small cast. This week formally introduces Oka, who is immediately a more interesting and dynamic character than her boyfriend Ueno, who’s your pretty standard horny school chum hanging on Tsubaki’s shoulder. Like Tsubaki, and the other guy last week (we already forgot his name), Oka is simply fascinated by Urabe, and wants to be her friend; after having seen her and Tsubaki together, and knowing approaching Tsubaki would be “troublesome”.
Keep an eye on the Voodoo page for more information. A link to the new brewpub website will be linked to there once it's up and running.
My tongue glides along my lip
You can use your keywords in the caption and also in the photo file name, which is also a great way to get SEO leverage. Putting up the IMG35235 is a huge waste of SEO potential energy.
However, seeing it in its proper context–you know, with the rest of the film in tow–has elevated it to a somewhat legendary status.
According to Melchione, a couple of weeks before final exams begin, students should put together an outline. Doing so will help students figure out the levels of focus needed for each subject.
Well, I did fill that notebook up with my first novel. Sparkly and beautiful and very worn out by the time I was done with it, I loved the notebook. I didn’t even want anyone touching the thing. No borrowing paper from this thing. It was special, but what was I supposed to do when it was full. Buy another, of course!
Bio: I’m a graphic designer by trade and a writer in my seemingly non-existent spare time. I live in Atlanta. You can find me on facebook, myspace (although not-so-much on the myspace anymore) and twitter.
Effectively, this is Spire’s all-in package.
Anyway, come on in and check out some of the most affordable decor ever!
Just popping in real quick to share the only family photo (well photos, but they are basically the same thing... but I didn't like the way I looked in the one Ryann smiled in, so I had to share them both :o) that we took over the holiday weekend. I really REALLY need to get better about asking someone to take a picture of all three of us. If have lots of pictures of Ryann, and several pictures of Ryann and Christopher or Ryann and I, but barely any of all three of us. Fail. Oh well.
There are some moments in politics when you feel that change is a’coming. There’s the moment Zuma stood up at Wits University 10 days before Polokwane and said, “We must declare a state of emergency on Aids and crime”, the moment FW won the referendum, the moment you realised John Mcain had no chance and Barack Obama would be the next US president. That feeling is in the air this week.
I have a new obsession.
Two months ago, my husband,Tom, had a terrible bicycle wreck and his scrotum was completely crushed. The pain was excruciating and the doctors didn't know if they could help him." You could hear a muffled gasp from the men in the congregation as they imagine the pain that poor Tom must have experienced. "Tom was unable to hold me or the children," she went on, "and every move caused him terrible pain." We prayed as the doctors performed a delicate operation, and it turned out they were able to piece together the crushed remnants of Tom's scrotum, and wrap wire around it to hold it in place." Again, the men in the congregation cringed and squirmed uncomfortably as they imagined the horrible surgery performed on Tom. "Now," she announced in a quivering voice, thank the Lord, Tom is out of the hospital and the doctors say that with time, his scrotum should recover completely." All the men sighed with unified relief.
“I haven’t found out what ‘retch’ means yet, but it’s a good word, I think.”
I remember worrying about what to do with the whole Santa thing a couple years back. I remember not wanting to yank it out of Christmas traditions completely but wanting to focus this Holiday mostly on Christ. I guess I felt like lots of kids these days expect HUGE presents or tons of little ones and are disappointed when they don't get what they want. I remember thinking, I don't want my kids to be like that, to be "entitled" as we the future generations are starting to be. I didn't want them to care about all the gifts that they get so much as they care about what this holiday is about. Of course all kids are excited to get presents on Christmas morning but I want them to know that it's okay if it's nothing fancy or huge (whether or not we can afford a big Christmas or not) it's okay to keep Christmas simple and still get fun, exciting presents because Christmas is about, as she put it her self "A real person, Jesus". I was also thinking about how some people play up the whole Santa thing so much and try to have their kids believe in him for as long as possible and that's fine, I don't think it's a bad thing but I do feel bad for the kids that some day they will be totally disappointing that he is not real. I think E will be okay with it and she won't be devastated, especially after that little conversation I heard, and that's good, I'm glad it won't rip her heart out :)
The hydrogen sulfide proved very troublesome because it corroded the hardware and formed compounds that hampered the processing equipment when it was separated from the steam. The current phase injects only carbon dioxide, while the next phase will also inject hydrogen sulfide into the basalt.
It is the season of oppression, dark metal, and tears.
We will be working with Adrienne this summer on her math skills. So hopefully she won't be behind at all by the time she starts 2nd grade. Whoah! My sweet baby girl is going to be in 2nd grade. Where did that time go?
I’m not certain how many of us are out there, but I do know that I am not alone in what I call “hyper-brain syndrome.” I may or may not have a slight propensity for obsessive thoughts. I can work, go to school, and deal with home life without anyone ever knowing that I have had approximately a basquillion (yes, basquillion is my made up word which used to be squillion but with inflation, I’ve had to become more creative) thought processes in the space of just moments.
Everything he could remember
So all in all went really well.
“Seven people for the two of us! That seems a bit much!”
I then stamped over the background using Tim Holtz stamps and used the text stamp from the Papillon set. I used the stamp without an acrylic block so that it didn't stamp a perfect image using Coffee Archival ink. I then stamped over that using Black Archival ink. I tore a page from an old book and then distressed it using Gathered Twigs, Aged Mahogany and Walnut Stain DI. The main image is a Stampedous stamp which I've stamped onto watercolour paper. I then painted it using Barn Door re-inker and Fired Brick Distress Stains and a little Bundled Sage re-inker for the leaves.
Once the United States was built up, it was decided that Europe would begin to be built up even more as well, more than they had already been built up at that point. The souls designing the plans made it so that the countries that they wanted built up the most would get built up and conquer the rest of the world, and they would do so by lending money to countries whom they know could not pay the debts back, to build up their countries and experience the prosperity that was given to the very souls who built up the United States to such levels of prosperity, by other countries and entities possessing the funds to do so.
Neither of these jobs, Hat World or Target are on my current resume. I have a college education and four more years of cleaning treadmills and screaming at ten year olds that serve a much better purpose. But my first job in zoning or ‘facing’ shelves and checking out rotten customers gave me the experience that just”answering phones” couldn’t have, it helped me appreciate a day off and made me promise that I would never, ever, work retail again.
To live life by what God said to you in the past and not what He is saying now is a recipe for disaster, pain and loss. Consider for a minute Abraham’s example from Genesis 22. If when he was instructed to sacrifice Isaac in verse 2 he had failed to listen continuously for God’s voice and instructions presently, he would have killed his son and not have heard God’s voice instructing him to spare his son’s life in verse 12 and thus aborting God’s plan and will for his life. Living by God’s every word means to continually live by what He is saying not what He had said.
pod branch
”Oh. What’s your name again? I can’t seem to remember right now.”
We are sticking with Ben Stiller as we head over to Starsky and Hutch, the 2004 spoof of the ultra cool cop show from the ’70’s. by way of confession, I do not believe I have seen n episode of the show in over twenty years. I vaguely remember an plot with Starsky being kidnapped by a Satanic cult, but that only because a Bob Jones rubberstamped teacher of mine back in elementary school once used it as an example of how popular culture glorified Satan. As if we were rooting for Satan over Starsky. As a direct spoof, much of the movie is lost on me. I am not familiar with the show and have to appreciate the movie on its own merits.
Friday the 23rd till Friday the 30th – “Irminsul: You Are Lost” @ Perrott’s Folly, Edgbaston, Birmingham – A collaborative art project (full list of artistes at that link), and also a good excuse to go up Perrott’s Folly, which you don’t get absolutely every day (although there have been a few things there before).
i caved into peer pressure!
04/16/2007 47.90
- Brian Jones: guitare slide sur "No Expectations", mellotron sur "Jigsaw Puzzle" et "Stray Cat Blues", harmonica sur "Dear Doctor" et "Prodigal Son", sitar et tambura sur "Street Fighting Man", choeurs sur "Sympathy for the Devil"
a fox mask on,
We note that as you rise up in consciousness there has been a sudden jump in the number of people discovering they have psychic abilities. It is early days for most of them but realise that in such an event, you are meant to develop it as a natural ability which will become more commonplace as time passes. Eventually you will all develop several types of talents that will for example include telepathy. We are talking of your elevation to a Galactic Human, that will bear little resemblance to how you perceive yourself now. Do not worry however, you will be gradually let into these changes and they will not overpower you. Indeed you will be grateful for your expanded abilities, that will make you adept and capable of becoming the Master that you are.
(like a little crab that skitters across the sand).
SameSame also quotes Melbourne Baptist Pastor Matt Glover, who says allowing same-sex marriages will benefit marriage as an institution:
$50- 125x125 button
Oh, there were a few... Diesel Fish, Cuckoo Spit, Majestic Giant and even The Radium Dazzlers spring to mind. Ha Ha Bonk was another, which you may remember is the sound of a man laughing his head off. Aside from the humour of Ha Ha Bonk, I liked the fact that the name could be reduced to a logo of 2HB, which you probably know is a great Roxy Music song. Anyway, in the event we didn't use any of those.
General rules for eating include: Eat clean, organically grown food. Avoid all pesticides and artificial fertilizers as well as chemicals of any kind. Avoid tamasic and overly rajasic foods such as sweets, coffee, and alcohol. (In the Ayurvedic system the word “rajasic” refers to foods that are active or turbulent, and that may cause agitation, anger, or fear. “Tamasic” refers to foods that make one feel heavy, dull, dark, or lethargic.) Reduce meat and animal products intake to a minimum. Usually cow’s milk is very difficult to digest unless it is organic and unprocessed; it should usually be drunk within 30 minutes of milking, while it is still warm. On a final note, there are certain body types that need a little animal product to feel balanced. Test your diet through the intuition that develops from the practice of yoga, and not what anyone believes is a yogic diet.
Please download the handout of the presentation in PDF format. If you would like the full-page PDF of the slide show presentation, you can also download it s from the event site.
Some say, "I'll inspire when I retire."And certainly, that is of value.
* 4 cups shredded mozzarella cheese, divided
Besides, corporate appreciation breeds confidence and a sense of self-worth. I feel that confidence is lacking among Singaporean quants. Some of them are really among the cleverest people I have met. And I have traveled far and wide and met some very clever people indeed. (Once I was in a CERN elevator with two Nobel laureates, as I will never tire of mentioning.)
Slim Jones - Philadelphia Stars
As it was already 5:30 by then, we headed for Franklin, where we will stay tonight and begin our search for treasure tomorrow…following a Weight Watcher meeting (wish us luck) that we found on line tonight. At the hotel, we met a Michigan couple who had also just come from Paducah. What nice people we have met all along the way.
She’s so fucking hot, man. Melting.
Yeah. So turns out, I don't really like tilapia.
“There is an element of risk to everything, especially when it comes to fulfilling your desires and creating happiness. Do not let the fear of taking these risks hold you back from manifesting. Simply ask for my help when the fear becomes too great. I can show you the easiest path to achieving your goals once it is requested of me. It is a small thing for me to help you clear the way to easily achieving what you desire and I am happy to do so with love in my heart for you.” – Archangel Michael
But today I was an acceptable substitute.
Roomie and I have been chatting about this over the New Year holiday weekend....through the massive advertising campaign that eHarmoney and Match.com put on we've discovered that you can 'communicate with your matches for free' over the New Year weekend....through Sunday night.....we've both contemplated these options and have been having lively, laugh outloud discussions about how one goes about meeting new possible romantic partners. We believe, gone is the day when you get all gussied up and head out to a bar and rustle up, or rather hustle up and new romantic conquest....besides, we're too old for that....seriously, I'm pretty sure I'd break something if I had to go out and shake my groove thang in order to get some guy's attention...especially since I'd be competing against 20 something PYTs.....
"YES! Mom, didn't you know there was an earthquake and a tsunami and a whole bunch of people got killed? Everyone was talking about it at school! EVERYONE knew about it except for me. Why don't you ever tell me about this stuff? Why don't you ever tell me ANYTHING?"
impulsive, romantic Marianne. Claire Tomalin in her biography of Austen says she grew ever more
This included one design and technology exam set by Edexcel for this summer “because exam topics were hinted at in a seminar”. The OCR test board changed a Latin GCSE due to an “examiner’s related activities”, it emerged.
I know, I'm lame. It's okay. That's not really news.
They both agreed that these lemon pie cupcakes they received where a real delicacy! And the packaging is so cute (thanks to my sister for taking the pictures at the bottom of this post so you can see it by your own). Their website is also very nice and very inviting. I can't wait to be back home this winter (here) / summer (there- in Argentina) to try them my-self!!
Fareda: Well you see, father, there were plenty bits of melted candle wax and I just thought that it would be a shame to put it to waste.
I sat listening quietly as we passed traffic on our way, slowing down to let early morning shoppers at the vegetable market cross the road. He spoke in Marathi. As he shifted gears to take a turn into one of the lanes he said, “Why should age be a factor, and not performance? So now they (government) think nothing of dumping all vehicles older than 25 years even if they’re running on CNG and functioning smoothly. They’re throwing everything away, the good and the bad.”
And, of course, there’s the small matter of the big sign saying “Please do your washing up – it’s not nice to see things in the morning” Jesus wept. I might leave a single plate, or something like that, overnight.
care for the queen
Change vector to raster layer and dropshadow it slightly.
First off, apologies for my internet silence over the last month. I’m currently travelling, and while I’ve had the best intentions of blogging while away, (un)surprisingly, that just hasn’t happened. And I finally made it to New York a week ago, and have collapsed in a pile of tissues and throat lozenges. Apparently going through three continents in three days will hurt your immune system. Who’d have thought?
1½ cups brown rice, cooked
And I’m proud to be an American
For my card I focused on the fact there are lots of different kinds of love in the world - love of family, friends, chocolate (LOL), and love of Mo's gorgeous images. This is Sophie and she was one of the first images I ever bought from Mo and holds a special place in my heart. Her innocent love for her 'baby doll' reminds me of my childhood, and my daughter's childhood. I found this fabulous poem on the net - it was just what I was looking for to add to my card.
This is terrorism in this country. This lady is a terrorist, shopping at Walmart. What do we know about her? How do we know she won’t walk in with a bomb strapped to herself and kill everyone in sight? Listen, this is my suggestion. If it means that ALL non Americans who weren’t born here get kicked out in order to start over fresh, then that’s fine. Lets just deport everyone back to their native lands. Now of course, that would mean, white people, you gotta go too. Can we really live together? Should the races have mixed to begin with? This is frustrating, and to read this story, it’s upsetting. Yes, I made light of it to a degree, but you better think about this stuff. This blog really doesn’t want to have to write about some psycho Muslim Extremist person getting all pissed off because Osama is dead.
OMGoodness, but yesterday was a long day! I started my day with a SCARY nightmare about dinosaurs. Not Barney dinosaurs. Not Land Before Time dinosaurs. Think Jurassic Park dinosaurs. In my dream, we'd found a way to bring dinosaurs back, and about 3 of them ended up near where we were. In my dream, my hubby wasn't too pleased about that. "Why did you bring back the MEAT eaters???" he wanted to know! So we all ran screaming for cover. It was my family and I and a few others. The T-Rexes (yep, THOSE scray ones) chased us, while we ducked for cover. We thought we were safe inside this low ceilinged room, but they managed to find us. The only shelter was a king sized bed. We all scrambled for it, but there wasn't room for everyone. I was under it, and I managed to grab one or two of my kids, but the others didn't fit. About that time, my alarm went off, and I woke up. Dang! Scary dream!
It's been quite a while since the wife's family has all come together, and Thanksgiving turned out to be the best time to accomplish that feat. The food was delicious, the company fabulous, and the visiting awesome! Best of all, they got long over due family photos out of it.
I still have A LOT to do...but I really like it so far!
so I also purchased a
Hors d'oeuvres are being passed and Jill tells the server that they look disgusting. Ramoner takes one and gives a lick to her dog; Brad pops one into his mouth. Then Jill and Bobby play a little prank on Brad.
I have recently completed an 80,000 word novel, Point Blank, an adult, military fictional piece implementing a technique of suspense similarly found in a Michael Crichton thriller, yet also containing a strong moral backbone that deals with racism found between cultures. The story relates greatly to the present political and economic situations in the US, and brings up a possible scenario of what might happen if compromises aren’t reached soon.
Cross split his childhood between Bristol, and Edinburgh slums where he was raised by a caring South African stepfather he now calls “the angel on one shoulder and the devil on the other”. Derek Cross introduced Neil to his lifelong loves of reading and writing, but also cast both light and shadow on his childhood, and still evokes conflicted appreciation in the now middle-aged author.
I did decide to go to college. I LOVED the community college level (as was evident in my 3.79 gpa), but once I transferred to the university level, it became more about the degree than the wonderful stuff that it had been about before, and I slowly did worse and worse. I got accepted to a school for my master's degree and decided to not go and live some life. I'd like to go back to school someday, maybe. But I know I don't need it to be successful, to live a rich and fulfilling life, and I don't give my kid's these impressions either.
How could we mesh these dances together? I sure didn’t know. I sought help. The Children’s Home and Aid Society in Sioux Falls, SD started me on a new path . . . one which led me to understand better the dance Naika was dancing. Once armed with education, I danced with fury and frenzy. I danced hard. I danced obsessively. I googled and read books on attachment disorder, parenting post-institutionalized children, went to support groups, talked things over incessantly with my running partner/best friend, invested in one-on-one counseling time, . . . . And all of this really really helped. Thank God. I recognized her dance. I learned a new dance. We abandoned our former parenting ways in regards to Naika and recognized more clearly what she needs from us; more than anything, she needs safety and connection–not discipline and consequences for “bad” behavior.
The study, published in the journal Personality and Individual Differences, suggests that outlook rather than experience and fortune has a strong influence on overall happiness.
Without further ado, Mr. Think walked into the middle of the ad hoc auditorium unbidden. He smiled and greeted his people and started speaking with the tone of an entertaining yet earnest story teller:
splintered toothpick loosely hanging
Saul of Tarsus was present when Stephen was stoned for he is mentioned in Acts 7:58.
All guns must also be registered --- the better to enforce the ownership caps.
Boxes and boxes and boxes. All saying the same thing. "All cards 25 cents!"
“The New Spirit In Media ~ Media That Makes A Difference”
a few weeks ago and yes, I know I have had a lot
His assignment goes wrong, but Damion escapes with the bikini woman Lara Martin. He takes her to his apartment where he is stunned when he realizes she is a female GTECH. He is unaware she is one of a newly engineered super woman soldier Serenity whose mission is to end the Renegades. Although he soothes her headaches and has her heart pumping, Lara’s customized brainwashing is to destroy her beloved who has doubts about his beloved’s loyalty.
Red New Potatoes, 2-3 small potatoes, cut into small pieces
he would have to wear my Polamalu jersey all day Monday
I made a decoration for the door and chocolate and vanilla dipped pretzel sticks.
Originally conceived as a spin-off of The Office, Parks & Recreation had a rough start but has now surpassed the originator of its mockumentary style. It comes back form a brief midseason break this week, and not a moment too soon. All we’re saying is, if Aziz ansari really did work in a small-town Indiana parks & rec, we’d get in on the ground floor of any new startup he founded.
As the racing Pontiac crossed Beverley, it’s front nose quickly dipped downwards towards the asphalt. From the distance it looked as though it’s four headlights and painted rubber bumper were gently kissing the black-top below. But then in an instant its face lifted upwards towards the Brooklyn skies above.
Divide the seasoned beef into ten balls (each should be the roughly the size of a golf ball). Lay each ball on a square of shortcrust pastry, put a quarter of a fig on top, brush beaten egg on the inside of the pastry, fold up the sides and then do your best to make them look like figs (or whatever your creative talents desire). Brush the outside with more egg before laying them onto a buttered baking dish.
That's the way the dance works; I do not know you, and likewise you do not know me. It's my job to provide the sign, and it's your job to recognize your name. And then walk up and stand in front of me. If you choose not to participate in the dance, even after you have said you would, be not surprised if I go home.
03. What's The Name Of That Cookie? - Chico & The Hornets
In his latest election broadcast earlier this week, Liberal Democrat London mayoral candidate Brian Paddick joined a long line of politicians and dug up the 15 year old corpse of Stephen Lawrence to use as a totem to support his political ambitions. By doing so, Paddick has succeeded in winning the rather dubious endorsement of Lawrence's “best friend" Duwayne Brooks who was showering Brian with praise in Wednesday's Evening Standard. This, following Stephen's mother Doreen Laurence's recent intervention on behalf of her old chum Ken Livingstone was evidence enough, if such were needed, that the Lawrence industry still retains significant grip on the balls of British politics.
Richard Meryon, director of the Garden Tomb, told Travelujah that the Arabic-Hebrew event has become “the most spiritually significant service here — can there be a more important signal to the World than that Palestinian and Israelis believers meet and worship together?”
1 tsp ginger
“Are you married?” he asked.
“No one else had the time.”
One hot chocolate for him and one strawberry smoothie for me, we sat quietly within ‘The Church’ bar before wandering down the main shopping precinct with in Dublin city centre and then deciding once we got to the river that we would exit the city and go back to the nature reserve we found the other day when attempting to find a couple of golf courses.
Lenny Kravitz
But they would laugh at us.
Also charged with burglary were: Carlos Goodall, 18, of Valhalla, NY; Mitchell Hundt, 20, of Chicago; Sean Gregg, 18, of Philadelphia; Terrence Hubbard, 23, of Ohio; and East Village resident Decorrus Jones, 25, who has been arrested 31 times for crimes like trespass and petit larceny. “He steals a lot,” cops said of Jones.
A lovely range of wines. Clos Centeilles deserves to be much better known than it is.
I’m not a fan of pregnant pictures (of myself) because I seem to gain my weight in my belly and my face. But, my mom insists we have to document this because in her words, I’m “making history” by being the first to have twins in our family. Alright. I know they’ll enjoy these years later.
Meaning: Wisdom
Last weekend I traveled to my hometown to visit family and friends and and to celebrate birthdays. I had my 3rd annual 29th birthday, and another friend of mine (Alison) had her 2nd annual 29th birthday (do the math). Alison's favorite cupcake flavor is S'mores, so I was itching to make these. I made the cupcake portion before traveling, but I had to make the marshmallow frosting the day of, since it doesn't hold up well overnight. It didn't take long to make, so that was fine. My 5 year old nephew (pictured below) was in awe when I was toasting these with my kitchen torch. He said, "It smells like roasted marshmallows in here." Precious!
One of the "hot" concepts in the academic psychology literature at the moment is a concept known as "Social Dominance Orientation" (SDO). This is said to be a newly discovered personality variable that predicts both conservatism and racism -- and generally shows conservatives to be a very bad lot.
As you know I posted a lovely post about the drama that has been going on the other day. It was mainly based towards some lovely comment threads at a lovely person’s blog. *cough* sarcasm *cough*
She said that she must monitor him closely. She said that they had made a mistake with the girl by not diagnosing it as kawasaki decease soon enough and she had to endure many scans etc unnecessarily. She said that they had to learn from their mistake.
So how does Memphis rebound from something that could end up being so catastrophic to a team’s psyche? Memphis was physically bullying Los Angeles and dominating in every area of the game for the first 40 minutes. It even got to the point that right before halftime; Marc Gasol made a tremendous “Dream Shake” on Evans, but missed the bunny in lane. No worries though, Dante Cunningham came from out-of-nowhere for the tip-slam over poster-boy Blake Griffin. That dunk brought the decibel level of the FedEx Forum to a deafening level.
Pop analyst Tony Jasper once posited that 1976 felt like a carefree, bubbly year for pop because most of us were blissfully unaware of the punk holocaust about to condemn the likes of Steve Harley, the Rollers and even dear old Mud to chart oblivion. Well, having lived through '75 and '76 I'll vouch for it being a breezy year, but maybe because something, anything would be an improvement on the year before.
The winners of the book give-away I announced here a few days ago have been picked, contacted and should be receiving their books any time now.
Just a thought:)
Lately there are more and more stores online where you can buy watches and find the latest fashion trends. Online stores provide a variety of replica watches of all known brands out there. A replica watch is not just a copy of the original watch but a quality accessory; however there are a few things you need to take into consideration when buying a watch online.
“I’d like to give people the benefit of the doubt that they didn’t know what was going on,” said Busick.
Letting our imagination be a priority is a luxury we should all set time aside for. Try it today and let me know where your imagination takes you.
This is very healthy and yummy Biscuits which I had tried the other day and it turned out v well ....... I wanted to try out this biscuits using horlicks from a long time , I tried it and loved the soft texture inside and hard and crunchy outside, In this recipe I had used just a little sugar ...you can increase the amount of sugar if u have got a very sweet tooth , So here goes the recipe for that......
1 squeeze
There seems to be a good system of bike paths along the rivers, usually coloured. In suburbia, coloured bike lanes on new roads appeared regularly. Some were physically separated from motorists and pedestrians, others were not. Bike paths are also parallel to the main railway line and highway to the Incheon airport.
Personality- You are still a pretty chill baby except for the evenings when you will often fuss for a while. You love to be held and snuggled and don't like it when we leave you alone. You've become VERY smiley and have started to smile more when we do something funny. I can't wait to hear you actually laugh! You are not scared of strangers and don't mind other people holding you. You also are not scared of the dog or cat and when you are tired you have no problem sleeping through a lot of noise during the day. So long as you are fed and have a dry diaper you are happy.
And there’s an incredibly narrow window in which that happens. In 1983 there’s Longleat. Not two years later, there’s the hiatus. This, in many ways, reflects one of Nathan-Turner’s most fundamental misunderstandings. Because he, as much as anyone, assumed Doctor Who worked like a cult show and that teasing the audience endlessly with the return of X was the way to build the show. The same failings that led the BBC to badly misjudge how many people would show up also led them, in other words, to misjudge what showing up meant in the first place and to double down on a “for the fans” approach that left the series exceedingly vulnerable when Michael Grade came along. (But more on that later.)
Though Bersih is a non-partisan body advocating for a just cause for the people, those affected most in the election will be the Opposition. For this reason, the Opposition felt strongly about this issue as they are the ones contesting in the elections, not Bersih.
17 lb. British pale (Maris Otter)
Let’s get you warmed up properly…here’s a few images to tempt those on the strictest diet!
This is one of the things I want to concentrate on this year - learning how to take photos in manual.
AS yet there doesn’t appear to be a firm release date but a first track has emerged online. The tune is a remix of, Bad Things, and features the aforementioned Freddie Gibbs on rhyming duties. And the good news is that it’s pretty damn good:
141. Studs Lonigan: James T. Farrell
We're sorta bad about Awards
Petey ‘Drool Face’ Mcgonagal. Lennox ‘The Ragin’ Cajun’ Levesque. Prince Haseed ‘Diaper full of Glory’ Smith.
So here is my cute 31 lunch tote monogrammed. It came in handy as it is easily recognizably mine when it fell out of my overstuffed teacher's bag and was found in the hall by the school nurse. It also matches everything of mine which again makes it easy to locate its owner.
Our driver explained that these structures are actually fortresses from the ancient Celtic people who used first settled this area. According to our driver, tribes would attack one another and these fortresses are where the women, children and livestock would be kept while the men fought each other. Once the fight was over, to the victor went the spoils, meaning the women, children and livestock.
GREGORY! *HEARTS AND FLOWERS* Say no more.
I'm craving for kaya roll now. Kaya is a rich custard made of coconut milk, sugar and egg. It is very popular here and usually served in those coffee shops on top of white bread, or as a filling for bun or bao and also for topping of pulut serikaya, Malysian/Singapore dessert with glutinous rice.
Two hours later, I lay in my bed, wide-eyed in the dark, totally unable to fall asleep. Every creak of the house, every rustle of the rats in their cage next to my bed was a sign of impending doom. Death was coming for me. An acidic oozing slime was even now churning its toxic way up the stairs, through the hallway, and over the threshold of my bedroom. It would be a swift killer, quickly slurping its way onto my bed and dripping its acid all over my face. I shuddered in the darkness, envisioning slow mutilated death. I began saying my prayers, making my peace with God, and continued yelling at my (moronic, dumb) self.
Enough pontificating. Off to bed.
Last week I asked you to submit any design problems you would like solved. For my first set of tutorials I plan to answer your questions in the order they were submitted, therefore, today I am going to tell you a bit about html hyperlinks - aka - links.
I'M DONE.
Bumiputera car dealers association Pekema as well as Malay rights lobby Perkasa have demanded that the government maintain Malaysia’s controversial permit system for imported cars, saying that the current system benefited Bumiputera businesses.
Dispatcher: “Driver, we need to have you to X shipper 400 miles away ASAP! They are there waiting for you to pick up a load we should have got yesterday. Dont waste anytime, just get there!”
The climb itself wasn’t too bad – it was just long, and steep, and unrelenting. Fortuitously for every 100m climbed I could hear the chocolate brownies calling my name a little more loudly – excellent motivation to make it to the top, even when it started raining. The views were unsurprisingly pretty magnificent, and we wound through villages of hill tribes staring at us as we crawled past.
Don’t overprice your home. It’s easy to think it will give you more bargaining room, but it could end up wasting your time. If the price of your home is significantly more than others in your neighborhood, buyers will overlook it. Save the time of waiting for a buyer who is willing to bargain, and list your home at a fair price.
These days, smoking cigarettes is the social equivalent of dropping trou in the middle of a crowded resturaunt and releasing a steamer on the carpet. Yet drinking alcohol is still acceptable--hell, it's even encouraged--because, as people say, there's no such thing as 'Second Hand Drink'. Which is a damn lie, if you've ever known anyone killed in a drunk driving accident. Sounds like second-hand drinking to me. But I digress. My point is that I'm a bit of an old school cat, and I remember those days, not all that long ago, when men were men and smoking was a sure-fire sign of badassery. And you know who was a badass? Butch from Pulp Fiction. And I...I wanna be like Butch! Even if QT doesn't want to get into the tobacco industry, I would welcome a cigarette case that just looks like a Red Apple pack. I may be asking a lot, but I'm not choosy.
for changing my life
Monday: Pages 1-57
We're excited.
Whilst the critical jury, even on those occasions when it cares to assemble in the first place, seems still to be out on Graun’s compositions – Charles Burney was an early detractor, accusing Graun of old-fashioned writing and a lack of originality – we can certainly say that they offer, from our musico-historical perspective, a number of ‘forward-looking’ aspects. Da capo arias are often replaced with two-section cavatinas – in Montezuma and a number of other cases, it seems, expressly at Frederick’s command. Moreover, ensembles prove sometimes to further the action in a fashion that might tempt us to think of Mozart. Christoph Henzel implicitly counsels against such an interpretation, when he points out that ‘the aim was to find a structure – one with short, concise scenes and as much lyrical music (and as little recitative) as possible – that would stress the visual rather than the psychological impact of the drama for an audience with scant knowledge of Italian language and literature.’ We might nevertheless, if so inclined, respond that motivation and influence may differ. Gluck was certainly not the sole influence on Mozart’s operatic developments, and Algarotti’s influential Essay specifically cited Montezuma as a model work in which the requirements of singers were subordinated to a properly coherent poetic idea.
Oprah: “Because you know that you’ve been accused of saying that gay people would not be welcome.”
A&E is “Real Life. Drama.” Now reaching more than 97 million homes, A&E is television that you can’t turn away from; where real life shows are dramatic and scripted dramas are authentic. A&E offers a diverse mix of high quality entertainment; ranging from the network’s original scripted series including “The Cleaner” starring Benjamin Bratt and “The Beast” starring Patrick Swayze, to signature Real-Life franchises, including the Emmy-nominated “Intervention,” “Dog The Bounty Hunter,” “Paranormal State” and “Criss Angel Mindfreak,” and the most successful justice shows on cable, including “The First 48” and “Crime 360.” The A&E website is located at http://www.aetv.com/.
I finished up the final edits to The Cowboy’s Summer Love last night.
Southern Vic (8th), 2010 Made In Taipan (Fell 5th)
It has been an interesting week. Slow in some ways and fruitful in others. I didn't get to the gym this week, or venture out much at all, other than the obligatory school runs and grocery store trips. No big plans for this weekend, perhaps a nice long walk on Sunday and without doubt some sleeping in!
I don't know, but it only took ALL night, and he LOVED it.
Current CTC:
I want this topic because, I want to show how illegal immigrants, leave their home country in search for a better life, and when they get to their destination such as the US or France or another first or second world country, they are treated badly and discriminated. Another reason is to show the hardships of this people in their voyage.
Now on to this months challenge at Sparkles Forum Challenge - THINGS WITH WINGS.
You see, two of our children live with HIV. It’s honestly not a big deal. Which is why you'll never see trumpets blowing, banners flying or any other crazy announcements. They are, first and foremost, incredible kids with an incredibly bright future.
Colonel MSC
For the record, "The Space Merchants" was first published in 1952.
Video and music files are large(Uncompressed 1080i high-definition video recorded at 60 frames per second eats up 410 gigabytes per hour of vide), they become difficult to transfer across the Internet quickly. To help speed up downloads, mathematical “codecs” were built to encode (“shrink”) a signal for transmission and then decode it for viewing or editing. Without codecs, downloads would take three to five times longer than they do now.
Each theme can be selected by four bloggers on first come first bases.
Hack! A fox, cleft in twain.
Ji Woo confronts Seung Yeon and tells her to go and tell Woo Hyun. “Go and tell him. Ever since I confessed to you I feel much better, even though it hurts that I got rejected.” She’s surprised and he congratulates her, it’s the first time she’s ever fallen for someone. She should hurry and tell Woo Hyun what’s in her heart. Off she goes to the airport. She finds his manager and asks where Woo Hyun is. His manager directs her there. He’s about to leave when she comes up to him and he’s so surprised he can’t say anything. After a few moments of silence though, he checks his watch and tells her to speak up if there’s something she wants to say. She begins to start but can’t find the right words and he’s in a bad mood anyway. He’s about to leave when Seung Yeon grabs his arms to stop him and not knowing what else to do, moves in for a kiss. Moments later, she draws back and at his stunned expression, ekes out an apology. He’s too stunned to say anything, which is when his manager comes up with coffee and tells him it’s time to leave. Like a zombie, Woo Hyun walks away and Seung Yeon stares after him. After he’s gone, Seung Yeon mutters the truth, “Actually, I’m a girl! Actually, I came to tell you I like you.” Woo Hyun is walking away in a daze and his manager wonders if he has a fever since his face is all red and Woo Hyun grabs his own chest, placing a fist over his heart.
Ameriano, basically a film about a mother-son relationship, includes footage shot of Mathieu Demy as a kid in the 1970's, by his real mother Agnes Varda. And the girl he pursues throughout the film, played by Salma Hayek, is named Lola, (coincidentally?) the name of the 1961 film directed by his father Jacques Demy, which starred Anouk Aimee, who co-starred with Chiara's father Marcello Mastroianni in La Dolce Vita. And of course, Chiara Mastroianni's mother Catherine Deneuve starred in Jacques Demy's Umbrellas of Cherbourg.
Oracle and Goddess Tarot
whenmybabydreams (@) gmail.com
Will MCA/MIC/Gerakan/PPP leave BN to support 3rd Force and perhaps survive on the liberal ticket that legislates rather than keep things one eye closed? Stop being an APARTHEID accepting lapdog and by leaving BN endorse and grant the 3 items. It’s just equality where Najib has the mandate to grant the above 3 items to ensure BN coalition wins but has not . . .
...and they only got fuzzier as the night wore on!
Each month will have a "theme" we will follow, and we want you to join! Below is a type of block which will be included in our overall block. (ex. HST could be a block with any type of design including HST's)
This is the collection of material to hunt for if you're looking for unreleased Floyd from the post-Barrett, pre-Dark Side era. Bootleg fidelity doesn't come any better than this; it's one of the very few occasions where you could argue that the sound may actually be better than most official releases. These BBC airshots from the late '60s and early '70s focus on rather obscure material: "Julia Dream," "If," "Green Is the Colour," "Embryo," and the never-released "Murderistic Women" (a blueprint for "Careful With That Axe, Eugene"). There are also full-bore workouts of "Echoes" and "Atom Heart Mother Suite" that, depending on one's taste, could be argued to exceed the officially issued versions.
keep turning my pages
The BIG one double zero…
Website Bookland listing page
An embrace that warmed me to my soul
The Chronic part of this is the most underestimated aspect by those who don’t suffer from it.
Denise: Life! I like to use what I know and what I am interested in to weave a tale of romance and suspense.
John is and non-the-less understand the importance
Last night however, I remained relatively sober - the better to be able to relate my adventures last night in the quartier.
I did not only use a Magnolia image but also the Angel Wing and So Wrapped Lovely dies and some Magnolia papers. So I really nearly made a "Magnolia only" card.
I looked at his lips. I probably don't need to tell you that they're really nice lips, kind of full and strong-looking.
10.) Johnnie Taylor – “Love Bones” (Memphis Soul). Stax / Volt label magic.
Deus ex machina cabriolet
I have used 3 different patterns from this set of papers, and simply added a couple of Basic Rhinestones and 3 butterflies die cut using the Beautiful Wings Sizzlit.
Abyss…I mean Joseph smiles.
In a lot of ways, it is an opportunity for us to start over again -- April may not have been the best month, but now we have the chance to make May a better one. ;)
1 to 1 ½ cups heavy cream
The Congress of South African Trade Unions, the largest labor federation in the country, and the South African Communist Party, have been pushing the Zuma-led ANC to make a radical shift away from Mbeki's pro-business policies.
The first time I tried it was on vacation in Australia. I’ve never had Greek food aside from fast food-type gyros, so my husband urged me to try this new dish. Holy cow, this was GOOD! The sauce was rich and savory with a touch of warm spices, and the tender eggplant soaked up all that delicious flavor. But a taste of the creamy, cheesy bechamel that topped it off sealed the deal. That night, I vowed to make my husband moussaka.
I smirk at him. Eyebrows jumping, I decide to laugh about it later right now. He’s making his mind up without me anyway.
SB: The name Airavata comes from the word ‘Iravat’ which means ‘one produced from water.’ As a child I used to remember the elephant’s name by thinking of the component parts ‘air’ and ‘water’ ( the ‘v’ is pronounced with a soft almost ‘w’ sound) . As you will see… the two elements of air and water are central to this elephant’s story.
“The Tigh nam Bodach is recognized as the oldest site of uninterrupted pagan ritual in Britain–some say in all of Europe. For centuries the family of stones are taken out of their house every spring and stood to face down the Glen. At the beginning of November they are carefully shut back up inside their house, where they shelter through the winter. The ritual coincides with the two great Celtic fire festivals, Beltane (May Day) and Samhain (‘All-Saints’ Day), and once echoed the annual migrations of the Highland cattle to and from the summer shielings.”
Fortunately Licorice and Milligan are fast eaters, so the buckets are empty!
No more before
Can someone be such a !#%$^@$#@ that regardless of all his other behavior, he's a pariah? I suppose the answer is sometimes yes, and sometimes no. Kayne West was a real jerk to Taylor Swift. But I think he's still out there doing whatever, wait.... I'm going to let you finish writing, but... Kayne West committed a fatal mistake in my opinion. It isn't clear whether or not he is still in the inner circles of the music community, but he appears to be doing okay with his fans despite his stunt. I'm not in the community so I can't say for sure.
I am truly loving the process of my December Daily. This Friday I will catch up with all my journaling and a couple layouts I have to complete for it but other than that, it's coming along nicely.
After importing the .png, .txt (.fnt) and .txt (JSON) files into an empty Unity scene and setting it up correctly, I got no errors in the Console and no fonts on screen (link to .unitypackage of this project).
Please add your links here
I am still here! Plugging along..... :)
◦Place salmon fillets in the marinade, cover with plastic wrap and refrigerate for 2 hours. Turn fillets so that the skins side is down half way through the marinading process.
With his superpara magnetic power
And if you believe a word of that, well, you’re more gullible than I ever imagined possible.
Spontaneously
Stars Brian Cox as an ass-kicking old man. But this is not the Red you're thinking of. This is a far more subdued affair, with Cox quietly mourning the death of his beloved doggy Red and not making moves on any Dame Helen Mirrens.
We were brainstorming for the perfect weekend escape spot in Malaysia that is not too far away and of course, has good food and nice to go with a few friends. The nearest place got to be Melaka but I voted for Penang! Reason was simple, I never been there for the past 7 years! It used to be a favourite holiday spot of my aunts. So mom and I would tag along with them and I remember staying at those old and dodgy motels (geee…), eating Cendol beside the road, praying at temples, walk up to Kek Lok Si… Those were part of my sweet memories with mom and it all happened at Penang :)
I am still crying myself to sleep at night, and I dread coming home from work knowing I will never see her wonderful face peeking out at me through the fence, I will never hear her welcoming nicker greeting me as I step out the door. I know I did the best I could for her and I know she had a great life with me, but this knowledge brings me no comfort. I know time only will help the hurt heal, and I know I will see her again in Heaven, but at this time, I would give almost anything to have my Coni back...
The answer is a resounding "no." It's obvious that I've never been able to stick to a "plan". So it makes sense that my new plan would be no plan.
35. Love? husband
It's that socially awkward aha moment when you suddenly get the joke, but it's also the moment when you realize that everyone else got it, like 30 minutes ago. And they're all staring at you. Ahaaaaawkward.
Not bad for a night time snack!
If you want to get your story published you do need to know what kind of books are being published NOW for children today. Don't rely on what you might remember about when you were a child but go to the bookshops and look at the books. Read them and see how long they are, if there are pictures, and the way the story is told. Find out where your story fits in generally.
I can't really give you amounts; it will depend on how many people you are serving.
“The IDF is ready for every battle and every mission,” he stated.
“In three words I can sum up everything I've learned about life: it goes on.”
but over time the lump goes out of tune.
Adam Yauch, a member of the seminal hip-hop trio the Beastie Boys, has died. He was 47 years old.
Copyright 1996-2004 VERITAS Software Corporation. All rights reserved.
At home the kids ate a banana and a tub of yoghurt for dinner then were put in bed. Which of course created a whole new world of drama.
1455 Veterans Highway
Simplicity 3837 Size RS 14-22
It cannot reduce eternal life.
One of my friends from high school just got a new horse and she wants to go so yesterday we hooked up her Suburban to my trailer and filled up the tires. I also took a look at Jasper's mane:
Finance Minister and deputy PM Bill English opened the afternoon then took part in the Mainland Minister’s forum with Kate Wilkinson, Jo Goodhew, Amy Adams and honorary Mainlander for the day, Hekia Parata. (And yes the gender imbalance was noted and approved!).
“Lets stop fooling around and give me the hostages so we can get this over with,” said Johan firmly.
A power couple always and forever. Your true love only comes once in a lifetime. Don’t let him go because he doesn’t fit society’s ideals or even your friends and family’s idea of who you should be with because, hey, you are marrying him, not them.
I am certain there are other communist-sympathising journos lurking in the past, including, I think, at least one secret CPA member who worked in the Canberra Press Gallery.
I said, 'Thanks, Jane, that's the greatest thing I've heard all day.
"We've built a new Earth.
*The next time I make this, I will probably experiment with adding cornstarch or arrowroot to thicken the syrup. It was not so much a drizzle as a puddle, and I would like it to be thicker and soak into the cake less quickly.
her dark skin smooth
Note that practices that may have helped set your experience in motion. Is your experience arising from pranayama, if so what type of pranayama and practiced for how long? Is it the result of repeating a mantra? If so, what type of mantra and to what deity or guru? Has it occurred as part of a meditation practice? Have you done any intense or new practice prior to the experience or is it the result of long term steady practices? Experiences from long term practices are likely to be more wholesome than those from short term but irregular intensive efforts.
Enjoy Holly & Kevin's wedding snippet provided by the fabulous Thomas Hughes Films. We had a wonderful time with our couple and their families in assisting them fulfill their vision and wish list for their incredibly romantic and classic dream day at The Ritz.
as he finetuned his guitar before beginning. There was no orchestra, no background singers. No choreographed swanky blocking or men in suits. But there WAS a talented musician, a guitar, and some of the most passionate and powerful vocalizing I’ve had the opportunity to enjoy.
in order to end up on top. Eventually.
I Timothy 6:6
“That’s just it! Why he treated me exquisitely providing everything I needed to be happy and killing those poor innocent victims is above my pay-grade to understand. No wait! I do understand. He is insane and vicious and capricious, vindictive, cruel, evil and stupid! I hate that moronic non-existent entity!”
a cue
So I went searching around the house and tried HEAPS of things.. then this morning it hit me to use and try Blue Tack.. Guess what it worked a treat. This stuff is cheap (i paid $2.50AUD for mine) and you can get it anywhere (post office, stationary store, department store, etc).. I am not sure what it is called out side Australia, it may even have the same name.. As it is made in Australia.. But I am sure it should be available international..
Apologies for my tardiness - things have been hectic to say the least round our place lately. More on that later (maybe).
Image: Tsukioka Yoshitoshi, Saitō no Oniwakamaru, Japan, 1872, Woodblock print on paper, Loaned by the Ed Freis Collection.
Fromagerie Fritz Kaiser: Tomme du Haut-Richelieu, a lovely washed-rind, goat-milk cheese from one of Quebec’s artisan-cheese pioneers.
I hate to think that I need to learn another program because Blogger is no longer supporting me. It's been a good year and I want to continue and become more and more active. I have a give-away plan in the works too.
- Candy from Doodlecharms Cricut Cartridge cut at 3
Korean spinach (shigumchi namool) is one of the most popular side dish (banchan) in Korean restaurants.
though i’m walking a bit dreamy &
Put your helmet on, keep your nose to the floor and don’t stop moving forward. Never give up.
My peace is all I ever had that’s all I ever knew
When you open that lid, you will be engulfed with Cajun deliciousness! Not to mention, you will probably be blown away by how beautiful it looks, with such little effort!
cause I will always be the same junzhu like I used to be.
All in all we had a wonderful time. We couldn't have asked for a better break. Cyrus has missed his family seeing how we all would sleep in and no one was there to see him off in the mornings, therefore he was glad to see us all wide awake and excited for the first day of school today.
I am only putting the pasta dough recipe here. You can add whatever sauce you like!
Here she is...ready for her close up....
You gals are the best!
He has italian citizenship since his mother never gave up her citizenship.
“I’ve brought you communion,” I continued. “Would you like communion?”
RAINBOW 2012 Submission
Here are some pictures of Jaxon before and after his laser treatment:
77) I myself do not fart. Okay, it's kind of like that "If a tree falls in the forest, and no one's around, does it make a sound" kind of thing. But still, I fart very rarely. I read that the average person farts about 15 times a day, and I can go days without farting.
Layer 3: Spiral Stitch
That's it soooo easy! She learned this trick from Cooks Illustrated. It is wonderful and works soooo well! Love 'em!!
Herbal tea so it is not caffeinated.
Also, give me some actual in-game rewards for Elite achievements. Yes, I could unlock a few graphical backgrounds for my player card in MW3, but that was it. I want some real, game-changer, Project X type of shit in there.
Belgian Candied Sugar
notorious forgery of the Tsarist Secret Police – an imagined blueprint
Before this, I had been a little concerned because driving home from my parent's house over Memorial Day, he was really, really quiet- which was so unusual for him. I asked him about it twice before and he said he was just thinking...
You Need Some Lovin' (T.L.C.)
March 15, 2011
Personality traits.
Now YOU GUYS!! Do it! Take your current Bio/Artist Statement and marinate it in Moxie!! It may not be appropriate in every single situation, but allow yourself to truly come through! Unabashedly! Say what you mean to say, tell people what makes you …YOU. Because that is in fact what makes your creations a one of a kind…because YOU made them. So tell the people how it is. I challenge you to write a new Bio! Even if you don’t consider yourself an Artist or Creative….do it anyway! Tell the world who you really are, blemishes and all, and do it in a funny way!! It’s actually quite refreshing. gives a good giggle, and can be something you cherish!
Sun - Slightly Spicy Spaghetti. Homeamde spaghetti sauce that simmers for 4 hours to complete, has a slight kick to it, but not overly spicy so kids will still love it. Served with Steam fresh corn .
I thought this book was extremely insightful, especially the section explaining why they feel practices like breastfeeding and co-sleeping mesh so well with the Catholic views of natural law and self-giving love. After reading this, I felt like I understood much better the reasons why those same practices felt so right for our family.
You know, the kind that makes conventional neighbors want to put up a fence so their kids can't see how much fun we're having at 9pm on a school night... doing shoulderstands with each other and looking like carny folk.
-Mickey mouseified Superheroes for sure.
Yes, I'm that mom who took her son to the doctor because of ear wax.
Alright.....enough of my rambling. I'll throw it to you.
Lucas Dalton, Duke of Winterson, is anything but dull. He’s a dashing and decorated war hero determined to help Cecily—even if that means looking the other way when she claims the dance card of Amelia Snow, this season’s most sought-after beauty. But Lucas has a reason for wanting Cecily to join the Egyptian Club: His brother went missing during one of Lord Hurston’s expeditions to Egypt. An alliance with the explorer’s bluestocking daughter could bring Lucas closer to the truth about what happened…or it could lead him to a more dangerous love than either he or Cecily could have imagined….
We had---13 sunny days
Jesus got down in the dirt with people. In the same way, this woman said, God didn’t mind getting down into the dirt with King David and He’s willing to do this for us, as well.
Everything else follows from that.
La Creme Cow can be found in the dairy section of your local Loblaws or Metro grocery stores (including No Frills and Real Canadian Superstore) nationwide and in the following formats:
"Should I?" I ask myself
I see how the concept of bringing a green leaf salad or protein shakes to a super bowl seems a little strange (and not that fun). So this post will focus on commercial (aka store brought) healthier alternatives to your favorite snack food. Later in the week I will post some super bowl recipe make overs.
Due to his typical ‘chocolate hero’ looks; he was publicized as a teen idol. After QSQT, he was seen in several other films in the late ’80s and early ’90s: Dil (1990), which became the highest grossing film of the year, Dil Hai Ke Manta Nahin (1991), Jo Jeeta Wohi Sikandar (1992), Hum Hain Rahi Pyar Ke (1993) for which he also wrote the screenplay), and Rangeela (1995). Most of these films were successful critically and commercially. Later on Andaz Apna Apna with Salman Khan is regarded his all time comedy film though this film didn’t get good reviews from critics. But today also this film is loved by every one and there are rumors that the makers are planning to make the sequel of Andaz Apna Apna. But in 1996 he just had one commercial success “Raja Hindustani” which was directed by Dharmesh Darshan. This film earned him his first Filmfare Best Actor Award, after six previous nominations, and went on to become the biggest hit of the year, as well as the third highest grossing Indian film of the 1990s and then he decided to do one good film every year. So in 1997, he co-starred with Ajay Devgan and was paired opposite Juhi Chawla in the film Ishq, which performed well at the box office. In 1998, Khan appeared in the quite successful Ghulam, for which he also did playback singing and the song he sung, Aati Kya Khandala… became everyone’s favorite
7. “PHANTOM” or “ALYAS PHANTOM”?!
Here is the story line: SHENZHEN: A traffic police officer who died after drinking too much alcohol was named a martyr who "died in the line of duty" (story here).
DANG. Tough one. Let's go with ... Harry Potter 7 part 1, District 9, Inception, Midnight in Paris, and what the hey, I really liked Avatar. (NOT the last airbender. love the show, hate m. night's destruction of it.)
So then, the most important thing that we were told to do as followers of Christ is not to share the gospel, but to LOVE our God with all our hearts, and to love our neighbor. He says that the second is like the first.
though
I know that it’s easy to take a look at my face
Now they were parents, their parents gone, and a man had come in the dead of night to announce with bells and great ceremony: the rains were coming. He said he was a judge, but they saw no gavel, and no clouds – yet.
first times in twenty one years
Plan A. With food.
But it is important to meet and hear the teaching of the gospel. Martin Luther writes in his commentary on Galatians that:
Hamas routinely attacks Gaza journalists and who disagree with its policies. Right now, there is no freedom of the press in Gaza and reporters self-censor out of fear for their lives. They have beaten journalists who try to cover anti-Hamas demonstrations, they have banned Fatah newspapers from Gaza, and they have even attacked documentary filmmakers.
She’s always waitin’ for my call,
While I was cleaning I wondered how easy it is to catch hantavirus from mouse turds. It's not the first time I wondered that very question.
Since going gluten-free, I don't make seitan very often but I wanted to do this challenge and I feel bad that Tom, who does not need to be gluten-free, eats that way because of me. I know he misses seitan; I do too, so you can imagine how happy he was to see this meal!!
I. Cannot. Wait.
Anything Heather wants, I automatically want for her.......
1970: being a good year for the chance indelible guitar figure (see below).
You can also use another kind of pudding in place of the chocolate. For example Lemon Lush would use 1 pkg. Lemon Pudding, Butterscotch Lush would use 1 pkg. butterscotch pudding, Pistachio Lush would use 1 pkg. pistachio pudding.
What about mousepads? Can we keep the ones we currently have?
Darren Holmes - 3.8 WAR = 3 points
connection
I'm still learning this blog thingy..
How do you say “thank you” when your design community is saying “thank you” to you? I guess you can say “my pleasure”, but then I still feel as though, I have to say “thank you” back.
Thanks for stopping by today, I'm off to Leicester to visit my Mum for a couple of days and I'm taking her to visit her nephew at Birmingham on Friday.
It was a great and inexpensive date! Just a couple of cups of coffee! Since we pushed this date back to April, we still have to make it to our original April date! Let's see if we can get that done in the next week!!
“Toward no crimes have men shown themselves so cold-bloodedly cruel as in punishing differences of belief”
Since I woke up this May morning from a dream about attending a meditation session, the logical choice is to start my day writing a post that reflects upon–well–preservation. Two weeks ago I wrote about the Alwyn Vincent project. To quote the site, “she’s finally out,” and on the steel wheels ‘n rails of a synchrolift.
She needed to borrow some flour for the meal she was preparing.
“I constantly want to get to know myself better and just become a more whole person,” said Visser. In the future, she hopes to work with campus ministry or a non-profit organization involved with charity work.
Instead, I'm enjoying a pint of a smoked porter residing in one of the pumps at the bar. I'm not much of one to head for the darker stuff, especially if it's smoky. Give me a pale pint of Ordinary or Best with a hearty malt base and a balanced hop blend, but this is not too bad. Its history began this spring when I was talking to the brewer at McMenamin's High Street Cafe in Eugene, my local when I'm "down in the ditch". He had a leftover partial sack of smoked malt sitting around, and we got talking about what to do with it. The plan became one of collaborating on a smoked porter up here at the brewery, to be shared between us. In October the plan finally came to fruition, and a very very smoky porter was born. Perhaps we shouldn't have chucked in the whole 45 lbs. of smoked malt, but it makes it mighty tasty with a side of bacon. I believe this to be the first ever collaboration between a McMenamins brewery and an outsider. See you at the pub for a pint, or at High Street once we do some replumbing in the beer storage room.
This Venator would be her downfall.
The writer told TV Line that 2013 will be "an amazing year" for fans of the sci-fi drama.
Me: What are you doing now?
This sharp canting liar’s a son of Javotte.
1974: Gene Tenace (DNP)
Driving my baby.
What I remember about that day more than anything else is the complete look of panic on the people’s faces. The terror in their eyes, and the fear in their voices. In my mind, the image is indelibly burned. It was the picture of utter and complete, undiluted fear. But in the crowd that day there were two people that were not afraid. There were two people who had no fear. The two people were me, and my Dad.
I highly recommend this book and give it a huge thumbs up.
"A wronged heiress, a faithful lover, a resourceful maid and, of course, an avaricious uncle play out their roles in the first opera ever performed in the American colonies. Flora swept the British Empire in the 18th century as one of the first ballad operas with lyrics written to the accompaniment of popular tunes of the time. In 1735, Flora reached Charleston and was such a success it was repeated the following year in the first purpose-built theatre in America, the Dock Street Theatre. Now 274 years later, Flora returns to the Dock Street as the theatre reopens after three years of renovation, in a delightful production that will thoroughly illuminate just why this was a theatrical staple throughout the 18th century."
Head and shoulders, so far as universal popularity is concerned, above other brands, stands out Guinness. Some of the other Dublin brands come remarkably near a prototype; but none has, or, at all events in pre-war days had quite full measure of the Guinness touch. Cork stouts have a delightful soft palatability and a distinction of their own.
The Black Star Aretha Mixtape coming this summer... (that's what I heard)
Other Recycling Logos
In an interview on set, Kevin Macdonald said that "It's a great, great story. And there aren't many great stories in the world which take hold of your throat and lead you the entire way, and I think this is one of those great stories."
Interestingly, the "brain's right hemisphere plays an essential role in understanding and appreciating humor," psychologist Daniel Pink finds from studying neuroscience research. Incongruity often enters into humor. Not too surprisingly, the brain's logical left side does not deal with surprise and incongruity well, Pink adds.
When you get to the "Going To Be Published" phase of this whole writing journey, people constantly ask for advice (both writers and non-writers). Which is fine. I like giving advice actually, though I usually pad it with a lot of disclaimers about how every path is different and you have to find what works for you. But what's interesting is that my advice is always changing, mostly based on what I'm going through at the time.
, I take shots from the car with now the song firmly in my head, I WAS BORN UNDER A WANDERING STAR!
And this is supposed to strengthen the peace in Northern Ireland? If this is the logic behind the Boston College subpoenas then truly the lunatics are now running the asylum.
*Delete as neccessary.
Please comment.
March is generally the month when I write about "All Things Irish or Celtic", in honor of St. Patrick's Day and my Irish heritage. I haven't written any this year, but since I am feeling better about Dan I might write a couple if I thought you were interested. Anything you want to see? Let me know!
I will myself to stand up and be strong
our warmest words all frozen in our throats
And I am not going to ignore it any more.
3. Canon Deluxe Gadget Bag.
“We have built solid relationships with the government and our stakeholders in Sarawak and more broadly in Malaysia and we thank them for their support. Looking into the future, we remain interested in development opportunities that may arise within the state and the country,” Côté said.
"The thief comes ONLY to steal and kill and destroy; I have come that they my have life, and have it to the FULL." John 10:10 (emphasis mine)
For anything beyond that—and most of what will need to be cleaned out is beyond that—you need to use some type of registry cleaning or registry repair software. This is true whether you use Windows 98, Windows XP or Windows Vista. You’re not capable of manually going through and removing every entry that can be removed.
If you are looking to find a sponsor for your blog, UPrinting.com is definitely interested. We offer giveaways, advertising and more for qualified bloggers.
The attention-grabbing “you” in science reporting headlines is the problem I’m concerned with here. It often adds an unrealistic level of certainty to science results.
Today, at 10:35 am,
The steep decline in the residential and non-residential building sectors over the past five years has greatly affected gypsum demand. Consumption of gypsum fell over 50%, from 41.6 million tons in 2006 to 19.4 million tons in 2010 (United States Geological Service). NAHB forecasts only a modest 1.3% increase in housing starts in 2011, then a 15% rise in 2012. Gypsum demand is expected to closely follow the housing starts forecast, remaining relatively flat in 2011 followed by a moderate increase in 2012.
For a start, it’s reassuring to know that Peter Jackson is not the only man out there who’s looking at 48 fps as the future of cinema. Last year, James Cameron announced his plans to shoot the Avatar sequels using this ‘superior’ method, and supposedly the format will be a massive step up for 3D filmmaking. We already know that The Hobbit is being shot using Red Epic cameras with 3Ality Technica 3D rigs, so it’s exciting to know that this is one upcoming film that is really throwing itself into the 3D world.
(Image credits: Marcio Madeira)
(Clear mirror)
I am new to the isle and the Queen, I’m sure, was a well loved Queen in order to have gained such respect and adoration from her subjects. She had people that she trusted to help her with decisions, although she was the final say in all things. As a monarchy, this is typical. However, while she lay in her sleep state – which would be the time during my arrival and some time before as well – Her Minister and Alderman were rarely seen around the city. Very little information was given regarding the affairs of the city, the laws, the hierarchy. I’d only met the men a few times and while they seemed like pleasant folk, I do not have enough knowledge of them to say I would want them as my sole Ruler.
Don’t think of orgasm as the destination. Sex should be about the journey and being in the moment. Stay attuned to your partner’s body and the sensations of closeness and passion, and let your orgasm and hers happen when they happen. Remember, there is no “right” time or way to achieve orgasm. Every individual and every orgasm is unique.
The storm started with a few innocent looking flurries around 11:00 am on Saturday. My parents were in town to visit for the weekend and, deciding that being outside wasn't the best option, we packed up and headed to the mall. Not a problem getting there but, when we emerged from the parking garage three hours later and made our way out of the mall lots and to the highway we were plunged into what felt like an instant time warp. It looked like January!
No breakdown of Japanese players would be complete without Ichiro:
Even the bride and groom are using divorce as an option if it does not work out, using divorce as a back up plan as they walk down the aisle. No wonder children do not stand a chance for stability when their parents are so wishy washy. Children are not disposable. They are a precious responsibility.
do not want to confront the issues that caused our estrangement. They
That is cause for celebration.
Or THE MAN,
6. Now that you’ve found your perfect business partner let the editor know that So-and-So agent will be getting in touch to handle the deal.
There are so many incredibly talented artists working in the darker, stranger corners of the art world that I feel are often times under-appreciated. By my estimation, Jack Pierce created an iconic character equally recognizable & important to the Mona Lisa with his beautifully designed Frankenstein Monster.
DP: Prima's Meadow Lark
My favorite character in the book was Cassie- and she was hardly in it (except in flashback memories). --(Sidenote: It was recently announced that Lisa is writing a companion novel to this in Cassie's POV- and I'm pretty excited about that! I'm hoping to have better luck with it!)
Smartphone’s hardware specs are impressive.
I was talking about my personal journey from doing and teaching Physical Interaction Design and why I expanded the focus of my research towards Service Design.
He who fucks nuns will later join the church
Lots of Glitter
Fight back.
-kosher salt and fresh black pepper
LiveOps! Guess what?!?! I’m actually doing this right now! I am taking calls in my home and making money (and blogging in between calls)!
Peach- Peaches in zone 5? You betcha! Try ‘Reliance’ It has excellent tree and bud hardiness.
With a score or so species, subspecies, and natural hybrids native to northeastern North America, the genus Amelanchier goes by several common names, many of which represent the plants' phenology:
ABCs of portion management:
Over 36 million Americans are classified as disabled; about 12% of the total population. More than 50% of those disabled Americans are in their working years, from 18-64.
4 – Point out the mistakes of othersPeople need to be aware of their failures or they’ll never be able to change. So, keep an eye out for others’ missteps or mishaps and then leak the word to the rest of your employees or volunteers. Be specific and stern. Don’t give the person a chance to explain his actions since that’s usually just a way of denial or shirking responsibility. It’s even more beneficial to make the shortcomings of others public, so that other people in the organization can keep them in line.
The filthy message hater came back like a wild tiger. ‘How dare you suggest I need psychiatric help.’ An avalanche of replies followed as the battle of the sexes took on proportions of Waterloo. Between each comment was ‘Stop this.’ ‘Stoppppppppppp.’ ‘Shut your mouths you stupids!’
One of her greatest joys was cooking and when Adrian and I were at school our friends all wanted to come to our house because there were always homemade cakes and biscuits to be had. I wanted to go to their house because they had granita biscuits from the shop. There was always a cake or sweet for anyone who was not feeling the best and she never arrived at my house without something she had baked. I think that one of my overriding memories of our mother would be her in the kitchen surrounded by the wonderful aromas of the food she had cooked with love for us but sadly “the kitchen has now
The Dublin House Price index stood at 78.6 at the end of December 2010 with the average cost of a home in the capital being €237,480 (compared with €238,986 at the end of Q3, 2010). The last time it was at this level was in March, 2002.
8. Change our welfare state into one that promotes entrepreneurship
In 1957, Dr Ellis Troughton, Mammal Curator at the Australian Museum, classed it as a distinct species, dubbing it Canis hallstromi, in honour of Sir Edward Hallstrom (President of the Taronga Park Trust), and in an attempt to initiate further studies of this hitherto largely-ignored form that would determine its precise taxonomic status. Troughton based his description of this new species upon a pair housed at Sydney’s Taronga Zoo. These had been received by Hallstrom in 1956 as a gift from Assistant District Officer J.P. Sinclair and Medical Assistant Albert Speer, who had obtained them while on patrol in the remote Lavani Valley in Papua's Southern Highlands District.
We have had word from .Too Corporation (the Copic Manufacturer), which is located south, in Tokyo.
Damn “obstinant” and “refusing” women! Stop thinking about yourselves! (shakes man fist)
He'd skeedaddled when he knew that Serge would be making a move and that I was too drunk to be able to resist.
Abby wrapped her arms around herself, glancing back at the house. She simply couldn’t burden this poor man with the fact that they’d found Zanna’s pretty blue wedding dress snipped to ribbons on the floor of her closet. If that sight had torn her heart in two, what might the implications do to their lifelong friend, who looked more devastated by the second? “Mama’s fit to be tied–same as your Mamm,” she remarked sadly, “while Barbara and the girls’re frettin’ over all the food that’s been fixed. And now people are gettin’ here, expectin’ a wedding–”
da Vinci
Mango Elephants in the Sun ~ by Susana Herrera (Cameroon)
new
8. Open the oven and place as many pitas as you can fit on the hot baking surface. They should be baked through and puffy after 3 minutes. If you’d like them crispier, add a few additional minutes.
To begin with, we need to recognize that all cities practice industrial policy. They don’t do it well; to begin with, cities tend to conduct industrial policy almost entirely through tax breaks and free public services. This drains the city of desperately needed revenues and puts an additional burden on the revenues that remain. It forces cities to compete in a vicious game of beggar-thy-neighbor where corporations can put the screws to everyone but the lowest moral common denominator. Next, most industrial policies are shaped in the dark and often in a disjointed fashion as opposed to as a comprehensive picture. As a result, the citizens of our municipalities rarely have the open debates and clear, democratic choices about the economic choices they are making.
I'll be reading from A Town Like Paris, chatting about life in the City of Light and hanging out with the in-laws (Shay hails from Brizvegas) - please come and join the fun.
Miss Munchkin and grandpa. This is her favorite spot in the house! Notice the book is in German. Gretchen is the only one that can read it but Etta doesn't care. It's an animal farm book so made up story line is great.
Kirsty steals his magical Rubix cube and summons the Cenobites, renowned the world over for giving piercing artists more money than anyone else. These characters are pretty vaguely defined right now, but they’re supposed to be some kind of demonic figures who make people repent for various sins they’ve committed, or something like that. I don’t know – they are cool looking, but they don’t really get much screen time here.
Harvey, on the other hand, is an acquired taste. Years ago, I had an employee who was a recluse and very difficult, yet we shared many views and interests. We often engaged in deep conversations, sometimes leading to debates. On one instance, I used the phrase "acquired taste." She was militant in her opinion that such a thing did not exist, telling me that acquired taste to her was synonymous with shoving something down one's throat. She averred that she knew all her likes and dislikes from an early age. I found that absurd and extremely narrow. We argued, and I cited bitter greens as an example of what is an acquired taste for most people. I argued that something can be truly disliked and, in time, come to be appreciated and even loved. That tastes can EVOLVE AND CHANGE. Some of the best things in life come to be appreciated over time. She was not persuaded, and I finally let it drop.
Zucca is in significant pain, and the ref stops the action. Zucca might need the whole 5 minutes here. That was as gruesome of a reaction to groin shot as you will ever see. Zucca is literally writhing in pain. Hopefully he’s OK.
Here are a bunch of young animators taking a break from their desks in order to provide "set designs" for the film. Even at this early age these artists were already masters of their craft. Under Walt Disney's guidance they elevated the art of personality animation to unimaginable heights.
A similar situation is faced by Kriffle in Jonathan’s second novella, Flidderbugs. Jonathan describes this book as “a sort of political satire/fable about a strange bunch of insects with some very peculiar obsessions.” Whereas the problem with Neville’s world – he never actually says it’s the Earth – is that it is spinning too fast; Kriffle’s tree – which is all the world he knows – is lopsided, sort of. Put it this way: it’s in danger of collapse. On one side of the tree, the side we are introduced to in the opening chapter, there is a problem with the leaves which are growing uncontrollably; this is the side of the tree where the Triplifer tribe live. On the other side, populated by the Quadrigons, the current ruling tribe (and hence those in possession of the shears), life is far more comfortable. The tribes disagree on just about everything but the most fundamental issue on which they cannot see eye to eye is with regard to how many points the leaves on the Krephiloff Tree should have: the Triplifers are adamant it is three, the Quadrigons insist it is four.
And I even felt like I was crazy writing that! (will it ever end)
If a man roars, he is dynamic. If a woman roars, she is hysterical. H. Knef
*The amount of Comal River springing from the hillside in Landa Park has decreased significantly. The ducks, geese, and swans are walking, instead of paddling and diving. The algae is drying up in places, as well. Some tubing is still going on, but people have to watch that their rearends don’t get scraped on rocks.
Frowning
Matthew 1:18
Is America in decline? That is a very provocative question. I have found that most people that hate the United States are very eager to agree that America is in decline, while a lot of those that love the United States are very hesitant to admit that America is in decline. Well, I am proud to be an American, but I cannot lie and tell you that America is doing just fine. The pieces of evidence compiled below are undeniable. Our economy is deathly ill and is rapidly getting worse. We were handed the keys to the greatest economic machine in the history of the world and we have wrecked it. But until we are willing to look in the mirror and admit how bad things have gotten, we won't be ready for the solutions that are necessary. The truth is that there are things that we can do to reverse the decline. It does not have to be permanent. We have gotten away from the things that made America great, and we need to admit that we are on the wrong path and start fixing this country. But if we choose to continue down the road that we are currently on, it will lead us into the darkest chapters in American history.
I believe You are most holy, God. All holy. Always holy. Only holy. Altogether holy.
Attainability: MARRIED
you said to me.
I have seen some comments lately that make me wonder. These comments, many of which are easy to see how they could be made, are not reflective of what we are called to by Jesus. They are attacks of a personal nature and not directed at the sin. We cannot be witnesses of grace and mercy if we are attacking the very people who need it.
The same day we held a garage sale to dispose of all my parent's worldly belongings. Again, sadness and tears.
When i started playing WoW it was as a warlock, people where always bitching about how hard the class was and that you needed to pay more attention to it. I gave it a try and loved it! After that i have compared a lot of the dot classes with the warlock because it has a good base mechanic. Widdeh let me try his shadow priest for a couple of weeks back in TBC and that blow my mind! I could dps and heal when things got shitty in Kara so i started a priest late in to TBC and it kinda replaced the warlock after a couple of weeks at 70.
The impish Arthur pronounced the meal “fit for kings and leprechauns!” He kissed her on both her cheeks.
The Chi Machine®
I believe I am to tell others.
There are way too many TLAs (three letter abbreviations) in the world.
She's saying new things all of the time, but it takes me a few times to realize what she's saying. It's so cute!
I did the Amazon Look Inside thing, and I wish I hadn't. Yikes! From what I can tell, the main thrust of the advice is: 1. Teen relationships aren't real and are bound for failure; 2. girls need to pretend to think guys are funny, "keep their mouths shut" and not dominate discussion with lots of squicky personal stuff, and stay mysterious, so the guy will "want" them; 3. under NO circumstances should a girl have sex, because she will feel "dirty and used" when the guy leaves her (which is inevitable) and starts bopping someone else.
Hex #4 Dec 1985
is written and directed by Ricky Gervais and Matthew Robinson that Barry
Thirty-one percent of women who lost their virginity during adolescence had premarital sex with multiple partners, compared to 24 per cent of those who waited.
On 24 June 2008, a CT scan revealed another bleed again on the right side of her brain. There was not much more that medicine or surgery could do except to keep her comfortable. I brought her home on 3 July 2008. The doctors expected her to last a few weeks. She lived till 2nd October, 2 years and 3 months.
Now, I have absolutely no problem with a hard-working family who needs assistance buying groceries for their children for a few months; or, for a family with a severely disabled child where one, or both, parents have to quit their jobs. That’s fine and understandable. They’re the reasons why these program’s were even started.
It’s too darn bad that the mid-1940’s Midnight was such a bland character. He had little personality, no super-powers, and lacked the grim drive for vengeance that characterized the stories of the first run, in the early forties. Even the impractical but charming vacuum gun was left behind. Try as he might (and he mightily did try), Cole could only make the Midnight stories about a tenth as fun to read as his Plastic Man series.
The ideological goal of the Empire of Poverty is to convince the subjects under its rule that social mobility is either impossible or undesirable. That they need to accept their place and their dole, and bend their shoulder to the task of making a better world under its enlightened guidance. The more that this mindset is cultivated among its subjects, the less they are able to envision another world where they might be free to do what they please.
Why should she give her bounty to the dead?
Not much prep work and you just put everything in the crockpot.
As I'm lazy and didn't want to make an extra trip to the grocery store, I chose a recipe that I already had the ingredients for - King Arthur's Lemon Bliss Cake. It's fairly easy and very yummy***, but I have one caveat: the recipe says to merely "lightly grease" your tube or bundt pan. Against my own better judgement, I followed those instructions, and it stuck, which is why you should not look at my picture above, but rather at The Food Librarian's version, which is much prettier. In reality, I should have ignored the "lightly grease" part, and should rather have buttered the heck out of the pan and then thoroughly floured it. Lesson learned.
Second - I am not on a mission to convert anybody on the blog. My purpose was merely to put in my 50 cents, be the voice of reason when the blog pumps and pumps negativity about South Africa.
Over to Hungary now, and a strong final as this year’s Hungarian entry by Compact Disco is definitely one of my favourites. But there was plenty of other prospects to tickle your tunebuds. Take for example this quality ballad, Vizio (Vertigo) performed by the amusingly named Caramel. If you were ever going to name a bloke Caramel, this is not how I would imagine him to look. Maybe he has a soft centre. He won Hungarian Pop Idol in 2005 and is now a judge on the show, so he probably knows his nougats from his pralines.
'Soooooo - how'd it go today?'
The photography tips in this show are legit. I am not kidding. As weird as it sounds, feeling the feeling you want to be in the photo as you take it do help. BUT… Tamayura do not exist. If they do, its called severe mold in your lens. I said that many times.. but probably I’m a little (a lot) jealous of Potte and her ability.
OR this easy standby:
- Seohyun (cameo)
How often do you REALLY see the whites of someone's eyes? Late this morning I got an excellent, all to close, view of someone's eyes when the driver in front of me, slowed slightly, pulled to the shoulder, then abruptly turned left (as part of a U turn) right in front of me. I can now say that I KNOW that my Prius has antilock brakes. I can say they saved this person's life, that, and the fact that at least he didn't stop when he looked out his side window and saw me coming for the first time. I would guess he was about 10 feet away when I passed the spot he had just vacated. The screeching tires would have been a nice effect, but probably would have meant my hitting him, likely quite hard. And side impacts have a high mortality rate.
end that never will quite button.
Covered in lights and shining bright,
Town clerk: (laughing) We have no ordinances. Just don’t go crazy and get hundreds of chickens, okay?
This is probably the most well-known shot of this scene and establishes the motif of looking at someone through an obstructed point of view. The camera is behind the teller's shoulder as her co-worker just barely peeks both of her eyes over it to look at Manny. How her eyes are slowly revealed is a wonderful touch. It also demonstrates the effectiveness of cheating space a little in the shot, as it closes up the gap between the teller and the co-worker established in the previous shot and frames the co-worker perfectly against the window, which the co-worker isn't that near.
Sam (Chord Overstreet) worked to get Mercedes (Amber Riley) back, and got a kiss in the auditorium to the tune of “Human Nature.”
E.T.: the Extra-Terrestrial
I have been using Sweet 'n Sassy stamps from the beginning. I even own their very first set. (Can you imagine how thrilled I was when they recently asked me to be on their design team??!!) I really wanted to use that first set today but the "rules" we were given required that we use current sets and their first set has been retired. Then my next thought was obvious...I'll make a birthday card! Sweet 'n Sassy has lots of fun images and characters for birthdays (Rhubarb and Cocoa are my FAVES!).
love is not just at the lip
What is the purpose of a book? Broadly-speaking to entertain and/or educate. There is no doubt whatsoever that Eagleman does both in this book. This is science for the rest of us, an update on where they are at the moment. Not that long ago the breaking news was mapping the human genome, before that the discovery of DNA and a while before that the surprising new revelation was the fact that the Earth was not the centre of the universe, the ramification of that last one being that humans were also not the centre of the universe. In fact, over the centuries, our place in that universe has become ever smaller and smaller. Now our place in the universe-that-is-ourselves – the I that I am – is under threat: if I am not the centre of my own universe then who am I and who’s running the shop?
“I’d like to know what time it is,” I say.
Paper: Tangelo Dungaree and Solar White by DiscountCardstock.com
Last but not least I will be going to lunch tomorrow with Leanne from Spend a Day in Second Grade!!I am very excited to meet her in person! She actually teaches at an elementary school I attended when I was younger. I will of course have pictures to share!
1 sheet gelatin
I wouldn't say it's interesting or shocking....weird/quirky, yes. When it comes to music I like, I will buy the CD but rarely do I ever listen to any of the tracks other than the one or two songs for which I bought it. When music was on vinyl albums, I rarely listened to Side 2 of any of them. I have record albums that are worn down on Side 1, but Side 2 is as pristine as the day the album was purchased. Unless the 'hit' was on Side 2. While I love "Blow at High Dough" by the Tragically Hip, I have yet to listen to the rest of that CD and I've had it since around 2004. I will listen to the entire album or CD if it's a band I'm obsessed with, like ELO or the Grateful Dead.
Brief date description: We went for an early dinner at a favourite restaurant near me. T. made various comments about how artsy I was (those of you who know me know I actually am not very artsy at all, I just like cute places and good people watching) and how he would never come to a place like this (or to this neighbourhood) in a different scenario. He said this in a nice way, but I still felt odd.
3. White, John, When The Spirit Comes With Power, IVP, 1988, pg. 95
"If I don't leave soon we'll be seeing the sun come up," she said as she pushed his hand away.
And Jacquie's kids? They may be those acorns you always hear about, the ones who fall not far from the ol' tree . . .
which could be said in any words she knows
Alice's Tea Cup (Chapter II)
Some will disagree, but I don’t think I could have expressed my feelings better. I don’t blame those who would disagree, either. I didn’t use to feel this way; it’s only since I moved to Illinois and had to take on two part-time jobs that I’ve opened to this perspective. That’s the insidious nature of success, you see. When you’ve got it, you don’t see why others don’t. It’s only by being pushed from the inside to the outside that you can really gain the perspective you need.
Ps, congrats to my cousin, who's wife has just given birth to a beautiful baby girl.
This is very important to remember: unLAWful – not Illegal – as it is common law which is the law of this land, and the law which we all have the right and duty to excersise our use of.
Decorated with slices of white onion and cilantro, it looked quite pretty, too.
I’m dying inside,with this want in mind, “build through my shaken faith,” he screams.
Camaal: Woooooowwwww.
THE STRAW THAT WE PLACED INSIDE THE COVERS FOR THE WINTER DID A GREAT JOB, AS THERE APPEARS TO BE NO CONDENSATION ON THE INSIDE COVER OF THE HIVE. THE BLUE STYROFOAM INSULATION ON THE OUTSIDE OF THE HIVE ON THE NORTH AND NORTHEAST SIDE WAS REALLY EFFECTIVE ALSO.
Paywalls, a certain amount of free articles per month, only letting readers access headlines if they don’t have a subscription, etc.
Film: We Need To Talk About Kevin
So what is on the horizon for Beer Valley Brewing? Ricks divulges his plans to release the Double Flag, a souped-up version of the already colossal stout. “A lot of people find it hard to believe, but it’s true. The Double Flag will not only be stronger, but will have more hops.”
There is new hope for thousands of pensioners swindled out of their full pensions, after the closure of a Basildon radiator plant.
top of page
You can visit the President Calvin Coolidge State Historic Site in Plymouth, VT (his birthplace). Here, Coolidge was sworn in as President of the United States by his father.
Last year wasn't as sad for us because Dave and I had only been in here for about 9 months. This year was a bit more sad saying goodbye to the people we had become friends with. Next year will be even more sad because some of our closest friends will be moving on.
Beloved, when I gave all diligence to write unto you of the common salvation, it was needful for me to write unto you, and exhort you that ye should earnestly contend for the faith which was once delivered unto the saints. For there are certain men crept in unawares, who were before of old ordained to this condemnation, ungodly men, turning the grace of our God into lasciviousness, and denying the only Lord God, and our Lord Jesus Christ.
In gaming the console іs а popular medium fоr entertainment through video games. With thе improvements in personal computer graphics and processing speed, dedicated simultaneous programs van be utilized whіle playing thе highest graphic games. The cataclysm hardware requirements normal and ultra settings in playing a game such aѕ world of war craft аre not far оut оf reach.
There's one flower and two banners from Tim Holtz dies too. After cutting out the shapes, I slightly mold them with a curved object (usually anything I can find on my messy desk). I also used Webster's Pages netting and letters, pink tissue paper, some old Collage Press paper, and Little Yellow Bicycle paper ribbon.
Favourite Animal: Dogs. Always dogs. We live with four of them and often take care of friends dogs when they go away.
* They extensively encoded prophecies of this cycle, and its ultimate effects, in dozens of ancient myths worldwide;
1/4 c. butter
almost impossible– but i have learned
When your elbow deep pulling pieces of a 50cal from someones ass you get a sense of perspective in the universe.
ZAN-na! ZAN-na! he heard in that beat. Silly, the things he thought of when he envisioned her pretty face gazing up at him in that playful way she had. Lord, please help me make her happy, every single day of our lives! he prayed as he continued watching their guests drive down the Lambrights’ lane. His mother and Zanna’s mamm, Treva, had been heading up the cooking and table setting all week, for the nearly four hundred friends and family members who would gather with them for this occasion–some from as far away as Holmes County, Ohio and Lancaster, Pennsylvania. He was glad to be marrying on a perfect autumn day, because it meant these folks from back East had a chance to celebrate with them: here in Missouri, Old Order Amish married any time during the year, not just in November. And what a backdrop for their day, all the sweet gum and maple trees ablaze in their red and orange glory, with a hint of frost to make them sparkle in the sunrise!
We all know of grand human projects that never came to fruition. Sometimes there is not enough money. Sometimes the plan is voted down. Sometimes the project fails because of lack of knowledge. We may have the means but not the power or the opposition may be too great.
The son had his return speech down-pat. He would be a servant and work his way back into his father’s good graces. At least this way, he would have three square meals and a roof over his head. Better than that pig slop and pig sty he came from. Literally.
But your medical care should go with you. You should get total deduction on it. It would be so much less expensive. It doesn’t solve every single problem, but you’re — you’re suffering from the consequence of way too much government and the cost going up because government has inflated the cost and we have a government-created recession, and that is a consequence of the business cycle.
While these guys are living their life and defeating one challenge after another there is a different group of people – they are the ones who are stuck and stuck for good. Most of the time you don’t have to ask them how they are doing, they will tell it to you themselves but if you do ask – be prepared – all that you will hear will be excuses only. And the reason is simple – these people they do have goals, dreams, but they have the wrong ones – they dream about something that is special to someone else but not them. This is where the problem is if you dream about something that is totally not important for you, you will be stuck at the starting point. Why? Well because that dream might be incredible and good looking for someone, but if it’s ugly for you – there will be no motivation behind it and this is how your drive will be lost. You will be looking for excuses how to NOT progress in this field instead of looking for a way how to reach it.
For the design on the black background paper I used one of my SU stamp sets with versamark ink and clear embossing powder. WOW...I haven't embossed in foreva!!!!
The screams from Jasmine’s room become all too frequent, as does Ron’s presence, forcing the child to deal with the patterns on the wall and the knocking at the casement. Winter’s last attempt to push away the onslaught of Spring brings violent winds. Shutters soon to be dressed in red geraniums rattle against their restraints. Branches dance as if possessed sending flamenco fingers
“Once shy, once bitten” is how I would summarize my overall experience with girls on trains. Subsequently I never met any more girls on trains. In fact I never met girls anywhere, except the ones my parents arranged during the bride hunt. But that’s altogether a different story. As I said earlier, I am not exactly of the romantic disposition. Come to think of it, I really did not like the movie ‘Before Sunrise’ all that much either. Did someone mention sour grapes?
Also, Kerzenstempel rausholen...
I thought I would capture a few images from the day, since I forgot my camera.
Miami Marlins catcher Brett Hayes had the scare of a lifetime when a gunman walked by his car while he was stuck in traffic in South Florida. Hayes had no idea that the gunman had shot two police officers and had officers chasing him down.
They let you keep gifts, as long as those gifts weren’t given to you by the criminal (in my case, that meant not only did I lose everything of material value I thought I had but also most of the gifts my husband had given to me over the almost two decades we were married!)
10/27 – The Exit – Fresno, CA
PHILIP MADOC, who played four notable roles in Doctor Who in the 60s and 70s – including the War Lord in The War Games and Doctor Mehendri Solon in The Brain of Morbius – passed away in March of this year, at the age of 77. Marcus Hearn takes a look back at the actor's distinguished career and at his contribution to Doctor Who.
After Hiroshima, I went to Himeji and Kobe before heading back to Kyoto for a couple days, then eventually back to Tokyo. Along the way I ate a lot more food that I couldn’t identify, Kobe beef, more sushi, a lot of beef tongue, and even a part of a cow that I guarantee most of you have not and would not eat. And I’ll tell you, other than that freaking nato everything was incredible. However, at some point I realized other than beer and sake I really hadn’t been embracing the Japanese drink world.
On to Saturday. The first race of the day, the 2 mile and the rematch with Edward Cheserek. Once again, Lukas went to the front. He ran lap after lap at a steady clip with Cheserek glued to his heels. Lapped runnners once again became an issue about the 3/4 mark. With 2 laps to go, Lukas started to let his stride out, like Futsum at FL, Lukas had run Cheserek's legs dead. With a lap to go the only question was would he break the record. Lukas broke the tape in 8:40.70 to Cheserek's 8:42.66, good for #2 and 3 all time. There is no doubt that Lukas would have broken the long standing Lindgren mark if he wasn't weaving around lapped runners.
Oman is in the Middle East, bordering the Arabian Sea, the Gulf of Oman, the Persian Gulf and Saudi Arabia, between Yemen and UAE. Its area is 309,500 sq km, or slightly smaller than Kansas. It has 2,092 km of coastline. The Oman terrain is central desert plain, with rugged mountains in the north and south. Its climate is dry desert; hot, humid along coast; hot, dry interior; strong southwest summer monsoon (May to September) in the far south.
Place butternut squash, parsnips, red peppers and onions in a roasting pan. Sprinkle liberally with salt, pepper and olive oil. Roast in a preheated oven of 425 degrees for 45 minutes to an hour, stirring midway, until done. Remove from the oven.
This night I ran around greeting students, snapping photos and hunting door prize winners with a megaphone.
After the weird warmth of March, April has turned out showery and cool so I have decided to retreat to sunnier climes and a time when a 'city' meant a collection of 10,000 people: a place called 'Classical Athens'.
But when I showed my mum and dad, as every kid does when they get good results, my dad was over the moon. He was so happy he gave me some cash but it was his smile and his pride when he said ‘Well done Andrew, I’m really proud of you’ that was worth more than any amount of money I could have been given.
But right now my little girl needs me to be more for her. And that is enough.
after the mountain’s
In a country with a population of 300,000, few artists can live from music alone, meaning they are untroubled by commercial considerations and are free to experiment. This is evident with Hjaltalín, one of the first bands on the bill. Comprising ten members, including one of only 20 bassoon players in the country, they play joyous singalong songs with a distinctly quirky twist.
Also select ASCII for the format and confirm that Allow Secret Key Export is checked (because this is the whole reason why we’re doing this).
Double Apple Bundt Cake
"No, that's not what I knocked on your door for", I replied angrily: "I've come here to find out what you're going to do about it."
8. Qwiki: It’s not perfect but any website that allows you to search for a topic then watch a slideshow about that topic while listening to audio content (a little fast but still useful) has to be a winner. Yes, the automated voice is a little annoying (but you can control the volume and pause the slideshow/go back over things) and the images are sometimes not the most accurate (check something before you let the children loose) but the pros still outweigh the cons as far as I am concerned. It even has read along captions with the slideshow which you can turn off if you want to.
“This was a vicious beating of an innocent doctor-turned-cover-up-turned-conspiracy, pure and simple. And our discipline apparatus couldn’t do a thing about it,” Falconer said.
That progress changes naught.
The relationship between Tris and Four in this book was amazing! With just the right amount of tension, it was perfect. And unlike many other YA books that have the "insta-love" aspect, this one was actually believable!
Washing the area down with a 1:30 bleach-water solution regularly, helps to keep the risk of an outbreak of infection to a minimum.
Oh! All this while I forgot to mention about him. He’s my college friend. We stay in same locality and our families too know each other well. When our college was over I started feeling a void. A void created with his absence. I was so used to of him that the very idea of not able to meet him everyday was killing me.
Ok, the girls probably take the mens underwear section.
Life is not like an ipod or an orchestra. We can’t always control the rush of noise that is our emotions. The best we can do is invest ourselves in varying activities, interests, and people. Through these occupations we can slow our fast beating hearts and our racing minds. The calming silence it provides can prevent a crash inside ourselves. Often love will seep through the cracks naturally when our hearts and minds are engaged elsewhere. I had been fortunate to have my volunteer work, my friends, my writing, my exercise routine, and the city’s infinite offerings to move me forward. I had been in a foolish rush to dig up a heart of gold. In this romantic failure I was reminded of how to let go of the uncontrollable.
As the world turned & the desert whispered its endless beatitudes, Paragon informed Davy, & re-informed him day after day, that just about all the other critters around weren’t doing their duties & were constantly brown-nosing Yahtzee, while he, Paragon, was the only one who was worth a 10-dollar blanket. “And there’s gonna be race wars in this country before you and I are dead!” he added one evening.
Somehow it was one of the best birthday's I had!!
I do love to write. In my heart, I know that this is God’s purpose for my life, but I don’t alway feel like writing. Not just because it’s difficult–if that were the only reason, I would have given up long ago–but because I fear my efforts are wasted. What if I finish this novel only to find that agents, editors, publishers, and readers want nothing to do with it?
I know some people dislike FR, and anything touched by Ed Greenwood. To many it makes them think of Elminster, the deus ex machina, or heavy handed "story" based game mastering. Even though Ed is not to blame for those practices, it feels like his FR is slightly more about people than monsters. Even though I love the explorative part of the game, and some good exhilarating fights with foul beasts, I can't but help feeling a lot of sympathy for a game where there are heroes and personalities around. It kind of makes the world feel like a real place. Someone lives there, and are doing heroic deeds.
To finish with, here's Dusty predating the Blues Brothers by almost fifteen years.
*gags*
Reminds me of the tortoise and the hare.
Q: What can a reader expect when they visit your blog?
This cannot be emphasized enough. You probably know what type of interests your step son or daughter has by this point. Make intentional efforts to spend one on one time with your child doing those things that they enjoy. Quality time with your child goes a long way whether they are a step child or your own biological child.
So, for those of you who are showing up here and scratching your heads about who this strange Ryan Rose Weaver person is (and where she is, for that matter), some clarification seems necessary.
- This is a perfect recipe for someone who loves edamame and corn, like I do. The salad is ready in no time, it is very substantial, can be a meal in itself, it’s delicious, and yet healthy. And it has all the colors of the traffic light ;-). What else can you ask from a dish.
This book presents, in extraordinary detail, sixteen landmark cases that profoundly affect the protection of intellectual property rights in China. Written by six prominent Chinese legal scholars and jurists – including judges who themselves participated in these decisions – each case is fully described and analysed: the parties and their representatives, the basic facts, the facts ascertained by the court, the evidence presented by plaintiffs and defendants, the judges’ opinions with their arguments and reasoning, the unanimous conclusions, and the
Did I go?
#59. long talks with my husband
“It has never trod in filth,
For those whom He foreknew, He also predestined to become conformed to the image of His Son, so that He would be the firstborn among many brethren” Rom 8:28-29
Here's to a new and healthy week!
City of Helsinki Urban Facts
Below are clips from the show.
This room is totally all about found treasures put together to create a rumply crumply pillowy haven, wearing many shades of white.
Color: White + Blue
For the cheesecake
coverage needed when faced with a “budget”.
So, every Wednesday I'm going to get on here and tell you what step I will be making on that next Monday. It might be pathetically easy for you, or something you already do, or something really hard for you. I plan on keeping them all pretty easy for myself, and you can alter things however you want to fit you and your life.
I don’t find many people around me are understanding about it, especially my husband. He does what he needs to do to be helpful. The fact that we are getting divorced does not help…he tells me it is stressful for him and I am sure it is. I guess the fact that he keeps telling me how stressful it is doesn’t make me feel any better!
“The Romneys here were always more prosperous than anyone else, they still are. They are hard workers and good managers. It’s funny how these traits are passed down in the genes,” said John Hatch, an amateur town historian.
cat like
E0000 1
* May consult w/ local, state, & national voluntary & governmental agencies, or w/ scientists at other institutions
Silver: Bastogne Blonde Ale, Rock Bottom Breweries, Louisville, CO
at the end of my birthday week
paid attention to how everyone in my fifth grade class walked
And he probably did see her for what she was, but what he saw was her vulnerability and her giving nature and her insecurity. She was his mark, not his love...and Britney..she just didn't see it. Is Britney stupid like people say?
*Piece all of your 1 ½” strips together, then sub-cut your strip pieces in 3”x8 ½” sets *Piece one 3”x8 ½” strip set to one 1 ½”x8 ½” strip of background fabric. Press. *Sew another 3”x8 ½” strip set to other side of 1 ½”x8 ½” background piece.
County Attorney William Sutter faces 18 charges of everything from inappropriate comments to staff, to giving his workload to others in order to play online games. His attorney says other are not lawyers and are therefore unable to judge him. He was appointed to the position when the former county attorney resigned and won election unopposed.
UPDATE: Taking into account a level of respect for these women, here they are sans exploitation, avec their respective co-hosts (see comments for full 'splainin'):
Admiral Robert J. Natter, USN (Ret.)
up into the air
After the hike we went to Olive Garden for a birthday dinner. When I got home Brenna, my sister, had presents waiting for me. Such lovely birthday gifts- a pair of fuzzy socks, Twix bars, little notepads, and two wall phrases to hang up in our new apartment once Jesse and I are married.
Of course we also had PE lessons and I was involved in sport at school and out of school too- dance lessons, skating, cross country, football and cricket, swimming (and hockey a few times) over the years- usually doing extra sport 2-4 times a week. I enjoyed being active, and never expected my parents to ferry me around if I was travelling locally. I was trusted from about secondary school age to walk into and back from town which was about a mile to the nearest point. I wandered around a bit at the weekends to see friends and I was always a slim and healthy kid.
And if you have 5 minutes to spare, below is a video about the making of the Lavazza (coffee) 2012 Calendar, where they asked 12 famous photographers to create self-portraits. Each had a very different take on the concept.
While in jail, Candace encounters, Madea who dishes out wisdom and encouragement to her, all while serving as a source of comfort and strength.
D.Lux
I may be a bit (I shudder to say) MIA this weekend but don’t you think I deserve what may be my first and last road trip of the year?
Bad, bad Angie. But hey, even though I'm not all that smooth, I do have lots of books in my office. Uh huh - I saw you perk up. Post below and tell me what you tend to forget, misplace or zone out on and you're entered to win a brand spanking new copy of Coveted by Shawntelle Madison! I'll even have her sign it for you.
This new years, my resolution for reading is to read more classics, and to be more active in the blogging community (rather than to super long absences I've logged in this year) more interviews, giveaways, etc...
4. Cleveland Browns
Fast Forward to this afternoon. I went to a different cafe, saw another lovely display of what I know as muffins and knew was budin in Buenos Aires. Read the menu and saw "budin" listed with a variety of muffin-like flavors. I ordered a cafe doble y un budin de limon. Confident I had cracked the code.
stuff blender to the top with dark greens
You see, while other kids were dreaming of being marine biologists (a popular career among my female classmates when we were 7), teachers, doctors, or stay at home mommies to kids with names like Laken and Trent, I had my eyes set on the Great White Way.
I found it deeply moving to be in the place where Jesus prayed on the night
Atmosphere 8/10
To begin with, background material is easy to add. For example, an e-book with a historical setting could have hyperlinks in the text so the reader can click on an unfamiliar word or historical character and “flip” to a short piece about that character or period of history, which would be included helpfully with the book. The same thing would work for books set in fantasy worlds, or in space, or any novel where the background might be of interest to readers as they are reading. JRR Tolkien wrote an entire book containing background to his epic “Lord of the Rings”, which was later published as “The Silmarillion". If he were writing today, he could have put all this background material into the Lord of the Rings, hyperlinked from the original text where appropriate. You might not want to read all this extra material the first time you read the story, of course, but it would be there if you did.
Here’s my first stab, which I made yesterday. I took a recipe I found online, which appears to have been developed by an ambitious teenager in Canada who also studies law. (Can I feel more like an overaged slacker in comparison? Not sure.) I’ve changed her recipe quite a bit: I’ve replaced her Earl Grey with Rose Pouchong, a flowery/smoky tea I get from Fortnum and Mason, and I’ve made a tea to add to the batter. I have added almond, which goes well with rose–they are cousins in the flora family tree. And I’ve melted the butter–I often use oil instead of butter in cakes and think the texture comes out less dry. I think you could replace the butter with oil here too.
The whole building is very square and geometric, with plain walls and an absence of decoration. The lines and shapes are very clean and clear. The exterior is cold and plain, though this is
Friday, 4/27: 6 hours (Success)
Art/Animation: 7/10
UPDATE III: Kyodo Gets Suspicious? Mitsui “claimed” radioactive agent is harmless to people — Radiation mentioned 4 times — Explosions started breaking out while shutting down plant
Taking stock of my own frustration, I took a backseat to the discussion and attempted to discern what was going on in the substructure of that online group. From my new perspective, I came to an ironic realization: that this very discussion, which was intended to identify the role of theology in online ministry, itself displayed the precise problems of ministry on the web. And so, upon reflection, I believe I can identify three significant problems, generated by the nature of online discourse, that cloud our ability to share the Christian faith online. If we are going to share faith authentically and digitally at the same time, we must both account and compensate for these difficulties.
Nicholas Cage stars as Tom Welles, a private detective who is hired by a wealthy widow who discovers a snuff film among her deceased husband’s possessions. She wants Welles to find out if it is real. Welles identifies the girlstarring in the film as Mary Ann Matthews. Matthews supposedly went off to Hollywood to become a legitimate actress, but her mother has heard nothing from her in quite some time. Welles tells her mother he will determine her fate. Does she want to know regardless of the outcome? Mrs. Matthews says she does.
Co-Author: Chrystle Fiedler
AG: It’s the difference between the perennial philosophy that we are talking about, monistic idealism, and what is called a kind of pantheism. That is, these views—which I call “ecological worldviews” and which Ken Wilber calls the same thing—are actually denigrating God by seeing God as limited to the immanent reality. On the face of it, this sounds good because everything becomes divine—the rocks, the trees, all the way to human beings, and they are all equal and they are all divinity—it sounds fine, but it certainly does not adhere to what the spiritual teachers knew. In the Bhagavad Gita, Krishna says to Arjuna, “All these things are in me, but I am not in them.” What does he mean by that? What he means is that “I am not exclusively in them.”
Brendan Gleeson, In Bruges
This past weekend was the first weekend I've had off and been able to sleep in for three whole months!! It was delightful and flew by in a flash. Friday night I was on such a high for some reason and after working ten and a half hours was hyper all night!
In a previous post I'd mentioned that there is a common belief among unpublished writers that it doesn't really matter if your title isn't quite as good as it can be when you're at the query stage because "an editor is just going to change it anyway."
“I think those people from the church. Or maybe those other people following us earlier. Somebody was coming, and I just felt I had to hide. What did you see in the house?”
I think this might be fun. For me, definitely; I started setting up the Pinterest site today; I can see already that this could be a very addictive thing for me! Hopefully for readers too. I’m still getting to know Pinterest, but ideally I’d ultimately like to do something where people could sort of vote for, say, the one dress out of all the Pinterest pics, that they most envision as Jessica’s (maybe just “like” it on Pinterest?) And then I could keep a running tally on perhaps my Facebook Author page (once it’s up and running again) and/or my Goodreads page, as to the results. Just a fun thing to do, if anybody feels like it (and a way to link people into my Author pages).
I am on a cabbage kick. I can't get enough of the stuff. So, when Dr. Food saw this recipe in Bruce Weinstein and Mark Scarbrough's book Goat: Meat, Milk, Cheese we had to make it. I love these guys a lot. This recipe is genius. Shanks with Cabbage, Port, and Vanilla. Sooooo good.
Wednesday PayPal announced the next move in its revamp of its product line: PayPal Payments, which lets you take customers’ money in person as well as online and on mobile devices.
Notice the similarity in response to the question.
-Plan your date for the afternoon. Take a walk in the park, while you hold hands and talk. You will spend nothing, get some exercise and breathe in some fresh air. Studies show that talking while walking side by side enhances communication because the conversation is viewed as more casual and less threatening.
It's this tension between delving into Lenny's head and stepping outside of it to offer us a sense of perspective that gives Daddy Longlegs its most fascinating quality; unlike Greenberg, Noah Baumbach's similarly discomfiting study of an adult fuck-up, the Safdies feel no need to stick so steadfastly outside their main character's point-of-view; they even going so far as to throw in a dream sequence featuring Lenny getting sucked dry by a giant mosquito. But when Daddy Longlegs finally does spend a sustained period of time outside of Lenny's vantage point in the film's concluding 15 minutes, the effect is quietly devastating: We begin to see him from the two sons' perspective after those two weeks with their father have passed into history, and suddenly he doesn't seem quite so likably loopy anymore, just abrasively so.
Mallery is best-known for her numerous contemporary romances, and while both Michelle and Carly are looking for new loves, their friendship and the relationship between mothers-and-daughters is center-stage. It’s often heavy-duty stuff, but Mallery’s not heavy-handed as she mixes trust and betrayal, heartbreak and humor. I’m looking forward to the next entry in the promised series.
* Trade Show Project Manager
It is interesting how change involves the renewing of one’s mind. We’re not to be conformed to this world, but transformed by the renewing of our minds. We need to endeavor to grow in our understanding, and indeed to hold on to that understanding. Although it is God who gives us understanding, we need to apply ourselves for this to happen. We’re acted on by God, but we act as well. Along with passivity pronounced at times in our actively waiting on God, seeking God, praying for change.
I see in V’s vintage recipes the trait both my grandmothers shared—avoidance of waste, turning vegetables that would otherwise be unused into chow-chow and pickles.
The Betar anthem contained the following verse:
or too awesome for me to grasp.
of yellow and red
Understand the system and pot odds, which is also produced in the context of other cases have been able to avoid thinking. It’s just open their eyes and accept the general rules of probability is – because otherwise the game of poker.
Thanks again for all the lovely comments, it was fab to "see" those who stopped by
I will bid you a good evening and catch up with you all again tomorrow.
You see, people follow those that add meaning to their existence, no matter how misconceived that may be. A leader is not necessarily the director of a great motion picture, but one who influences others to follow the big picture out of their own free will. The right people need to be “influenced” to bring a dream on paper to reality on the screen.
2) Song format is generally absent e.g.Nick Hennies, ST 37...This is not a bad thing, either. It will help you to listen deeper. The Ernesto Diaz Infante CDR is especially good for depth charges. IMHO, as the kids say.
Let's hope there is never a repeat performance of that joke.
I guess that my overwhelming feeling at this post was one of immense sadness. I am sad for the people who believe this, and I am sad for the children who live under it's iron hand. Parenting is so hard and so complex for so many people, and I understand the need to latch on to some sort of framework or schema that helps us make good decisions when things get dicey. But these frameworks - like the one above- represent a degree of hubris and authority that is completely contrived. I wish that more parents were willing or able to think more about these schemas and then look for other possible alternatives that could work well for their families.
This morning, with TM off to work early, instead of rushing to meditate, shower, then walk the dog straightaway, I sat with a cup of tea watching the birds in the courtyard, and then picked up Ruiz's book.
They have made in every ?olor ?nder the rainbow so?e form of eye catching fish des?gn ready t? be ti?d t? th? ?nd of ?our fishing line. The lur?s are painted, metal ?nd plastic some with hologram? shim?ing and c?lling ?ur name. “Look, I wi?l fo?l that fish, I promise” or “If ?ou just try me I know I c?n catch huge fish. ”
The weather was very pleasant, so Jefferson Street was crowded with people strolling the art scene.
To tell you the truth, kids, I didn’t even notice, so it probably wasn’t that obvious.
With a reported 30 to 50 per cent of U.S. teens consuming energy drinks, and as many as 62 per cent drinking at least one sports drink per day, it is important to educate parents and young adults about the downside of these drinks.
In other words, I need products to GTTP – Get to the Point, with a price that I can emotionally accept.
or Vickie Lynn
I think it's time to share with you the project that I created to share with you.
The 3 best performances come from Chunky Pandey, who appears to be the only one who knows to not take himself seriously in this movie and as “Aakhri Pasta” is good everytime he is on screen. Johnny Lever as Mithun’s sidekick is hilarious and is almost the scene stealer but the scene-stealing performance here goes to Ranjeet (playing a takeoff on his characters from the 80s called Ranjeet V.Asna K Poojari, the-rapist) who has the only 2 genuinely funny scenes in the movie.
Regrettable but true: there is only one American context for the idea of a North/South divide, and it always involves the Civil War. But I’m not going to talk about this 1985 series, nor am I going to talk about Patrick Swayze.
My family is really being super good sports so far. I have to tell you, even the recipes that we make and are keeping are not delicious. We keep them because they are edible. I can totally see why so fewer people were obese 100 years ago. There is no chance of stuffing your face just because the food is so good. You eat because you are hungry and as soon as you are not hungry, you stop eating. We are back to looking at food purely as fuel. I suppose that is a healthier relationship to have with food but it's hard. Last night a commercial for Chili's Restaurant came on and I thought I was going to die. Big saucy, cheesy dishes, brownie and ice cream smothered in hot fudge...... I can't go on.
Unable to get Bates to talk about his experiences or rouse him from his apparent stupor, no further testing was attempted while they committed Ned to the hospital. The next tester, Rhoda Jenkins, was part of the scripting team. She is currently undergoing treatment for PTSD and severe claustrophobia. She is still unwilling to talk about her experience inside “the hate box”(as it came to be known) except for one in response to an offhand comment that she was “only a few hours” inside the machine. Rhoda was heard to reply “longer than that” but refused to further elaborate.
Even if you decide these are must haves, there are lots of stores that get the BTAC, including both the big chains and some much smaller, off the radar stores. There are always a few bottles that languish on shelves and usually some that pop up mid-year. If you live in Southern California and you are willing to put in a little bit of effort (i.e. drive around a bit), you should be able to find a bottle of each without too much effort.
I found some nice fresh scallops in the wet market recently. Initially I wanted to use them for steamboat but did not do so when I found that their shell break easily. I don't want the shell broken pieces in my steamboat!
My head though?
K&Company Lovely pp
The Kirre is another dangerous, psionic predator. They resemble eight-legged great cats but with a pair of curving horns and a tail studded with barbed spikes.
The Classic Romantic
Have I told? I Crochet... I love it, I love it, I love it so much! I started to make a scarf.... Yeah, a Christmas Present for myself... From white yarn... I almost saw myself to be in full bloom in my scarf which I made ... ahhh... beautiful dream... I have a very good imagine power... :))
Leon went to Comodoro to address the Boer community shortly after he was made ambassador in August 2009. He said to the congregation (in Afrikaans, of course): "I hope that this community and its heritage and language will survive in Argentina" and was fed some of Hammond's melktert. Hammond runs Die Kleep, a koffiehuis in the town. She started the place eight years ago to mark the centenary of the Boers' arrival here.
* 2.3 million recyclable cups holding water and Gatorade
Now that is how Christians in America should be “fighting to protect the sanctity of marriage.” Not in the political arena.
I believe that she will squeal with happiness whenever I finally breath my last breath here and I believe that she is held in the literal, loving hands of God.
'If your heart stutters with pain and hope
stay alone and LOVE your addictions
-A.C. Crispin
The way that Bruce Banner is currently being written is a fucking travesty. Banner being conflicted is a good thing, him being a complete douchebag is not. I love the character of the Hulk, I want to read Hulk comics, but Marvel is making it very difficult for me to do that.
I stole this from my wordpress blog...since I don't think I will continue there...
A couple of months ago, the DAY OF THE DEADLINE FOR THE AWARDS, to be precise, Mr PBBB asked me if I'd mind photocopying his entries and 'popping them in the post', as he was off to a beer tasting. Seriously.
I started paying more attention to my appearance. Ribbon barrettes and french braids in my hair, collars turned up, big hoop earrings, shoulder pads, neon shirts, overalls with one strap undone (what were we thinking?), makeup. It was the eighties. Fashion ex-tra-va-ganza.
Charted canvaswork from the start was a delight. Being able to stitch complex twisting and turning stitches using a variety of different textured threads on a stable background fabric was just right. The amazing range of threads and colors available is just mind blowing, and now companies are producing hand-dyed canvas in a wonderful and exciting range of colors to add to the mix. It will be so exciting to see what needlepoint supplies will be created in the future.
I Am Legend is a favourite book and I had few problems with the Will Smith movie. I guess that's another:
I want to shake her sometimes and point out there is never a perfect time to have a baby. If you wait until everything is perfect, it will never happen. I can see her walking down the same tragically sad road that C is on now and regretting it every step of the way. It’s possible that C will never be able to have children. She’ll try again, of course, because she wants it so badly, but she knows her chances are very slim.
Deut. 30:14
Actually, the history of worship on the site goes back even further. In March, 1736, Charles Wesley held worship services for the new settlers at Frederica. In 1737 John Wesley established a church for the people of Frederica and the other settlement on the island, Fort St. Simon. When John Wesley left St. Simons he was replaced by George Whitefield. All three men held services on the site of the present church.
Overall, like I mentioned before, the transition has been a smooth one with very few bumps. But this is coming back to my home country, where I spent most of my life. The transition to Korea was much more challenging than anything I’ve ever done in my life. But it was also the best decision I’ve ever made. Sometimes the hardest decisions to make turn out to be the ones that are impossible to regret. I can only hope that my decision to move back to the States and pursue a career in HR will be as rewarding as the one I made 3.5 years ago.
On February 7, 2006, she was named a knight of the Ordre des Arts et des Lettres of France for outstanding achievement in the field of art and literature.
I'm short. Only 65 items, but I'm short. sigh..... So I spent the obligatory 5 minutes thinking about what I could have done differently, about the sales I didn't make, the items I didn't list and then I stopped. My business has taken such an upturn this year and I have been so fortunate that it would be absolutely stupid of me to be anything but happy about my accomplishments this year.
Fancy? Yes, yes I am. Thank you Kristin for the inspiration and Hun for the hearts. This was actually Sunday hair, they got to dress up like cowgirls for the birthday celebration, so long braids coming out of cowboy hats were the order of the day. Lots of love and kisses to all.
The Internet has the scale to match any other channel. Eighty-three percent of American adults are now online (compared with 96% who watch TV), and online users spend marginally more time online each week than they spend watching TV. In total, I estimate that for every hour the average American spent watching TV in 2010, they spent about .9 hours online. I expect that when we get our 2011 survey data back, the channels will be neck-and-neck. The Internet has the depth to beat any other channel. Marketers no longer have to limit themselves to the quick brand impressions made by TV spots or billboards; their websites offer them all the depth they need to convey complex brand attributes and engage users. And consumers actually want brands to offer them this depth online—it’s why so many users go straight to Google to learn more about the brands they see advertised offline, and why the Internet is consumers’ most trusted source of brand and product information.
A Monarch butterfly busy collecting nectar from a Mexican Sunflower blossom.
Hopefully that heading got your attention. I suppose the fact that you have read this far suggests that it did. Thanks for that. Welcome, if this is your first visit. Welcome back if it’s not.
I wish I had written this letter to myself in 2007:
Once the ink is completely dry, its just a matter of trimming the tissue paper away from the plain paper where you taped it down...because my canvas was smaller than A4 size this allowed me to cut it a little higher but for a true A4 canvas you would need to be more precise and cut closer to the tape.
9:30 update:
I think the hardest thing to come to terms with here is the laid back style of how things are done. "God willing" is the way everything is looked at, and this means it will happen if god decodes it will, and we will do nothing to make it happen sooner or later. Once you accept this, life is easier. Oh, and I never thought I'd miss pork, but seeing as I don't like lamb, it's chicken or beef for me, and sometimes fish, although we are not very good on buying and cooking fish. It needs a bit more thought behind it than just popping over to the shop and getting a fillet or two to throw in the oven. This is because we don't have any shops as close as we used to in Norway. Just a matter of changing routines, but not gotten that far yet. Although I found some cod fillets and hake fillets in the freezer section yesterday. Maybe start with the easy stuff?
Born in Northern Canada, Angela grew up on the Canadian prairies amid dreams of becoming the next Dian Fossey or a world famous flight attendant. Those, however, were never meant to be. Instead, she moved to Texas and then eventually beautiful Colorado where she divides her time between her family, writing and her other job, teaching.
Gabrielle Tayac, national Museum of the American Indian
She was only 16 for a day before securing this coveted prize. Come on! I didn't get mine until I was 19 and even then, it was after a few attempts. I'm really proud of her. I used to ride my bike everywhere and I guess I had no real need for a car/license in a small coastal town.
I: Okay. Is this better? Can you hear me now?
So, since I've been absent for way too long from this here blog, I thought I'd do what I do best and give you a list. A list of Kryptonites, my ultimate physical weaknesses. Ok, let's do this.
3 T. melted Earth Balance (margarine)
But before you think Cinnaholic is just cinnamon rolls, hold on. They make specialty rolls including Chocolate Chip Cookie Dough, Fudge Brownie Chunk, Gone Bananas, Mocha Almond, Oreo Explosion, Peanut Butter n’ Jelly, Rocky Road and S’mores.
Just as a matter of interest… given this was a first-time test drive of Cyberskin, much anticipated since your earlier dildo post… did it live up to it’s “life-like give” expectations fully? You say it was the “real deal”, can you give us the clinical detail, (at the risk of lowering your wonderful wonderful blog to a sexual health forum…perish the thought!)
In Water Rat, one of Uncle’s oldest friends comes to him for help: his nephew Andrew is floundering when he loses five million dollars after financing a rather fishy seafood operation. The operation goes fish-belly up (okay, no more oceanic puns, I promise) and the owners have disappeared with the money that rightfully belongs to Andrew. Ava takes the case and tracks down the owners of the seafood operation, George Antonelli and Jackson Seto. Using bribery, blackmail, violence, and a perfectly worn Brooks Brothers outfit, Ava finally ends up in Guyana, paying off the local police chief/crime lord Captain Robbins to help her corner Seto and close the deal.
I'm a gluten "lite" - tons of veggies, free range chicken and wild salmon eatin' dude these days. I'm discovering the less gluten the better for my body chemistry. I was vegan for years and recently I added free range chicken and wild salmon. Universal black and white mandates for all is short-sighted. I lost some weight eating just veggies, fruit and beans so I've upped the protein and calories. Making adjusts based on ever changing needs (especially as I get older) is perfectly normal. The diet guide in P90X and the one in my book are different. So what? Both ask you to eat HEALTHY FOOD! Some people can be vegan for a lifetime while others fluctuate from one healthy diet to another. The key word here is healthy. My weight will go up and down 10 pounds but as long as the food I'm eating is healthy and whole I'll probably be okay.
That same day, the Times printed an article that raises concerns about the equity of the entrance exam for the “Gifted Kindergarten” programs run by the New York City’s Board of Education, particularly when so many parents with resources take their children to private preparation classes that train them to be more poised and confident when meeting with the examiner. Poise and confidence in a 5-year-old do not necessarily relate to unusually high intelligence, but such traits have frequently been socially and culturally encouraged among a certain subset of US parents who may also tend to have decent incomes and are willing to pay a little more for access to a high quality publicly provided education. The Times is perhaps reporting this story about 25 years after I became aware of equity problems in the entrance exam for the gifted program. At that time, friends of mine who had a perfectly bright and appealing young son took him into be tested for the “gifted” kindergarten. He became suddenly shy and hid behind his mother’s skirt, refusing to answer the questions posed to him, even though all the questions were well within his ability. He did not get into the program. Among the children I knew who did get into this program, there were none that I would consider to be child prodigies with special needs; just children who are quick to learn, similar to many others found at the top of their classrooms.
Axelrod: welcome to the grown-up world Fluffy
All my heart,
Jackson hesitates. He’s really been trying to appear “normal” to his peers. No one needs to know how hard he’s been working to keep his dark nature under control. He casts one last glance at the woman then heads over to where several of the Guardians from the Seattle field office are sitting.
2. LISTEN
There have been a few of these memes floating around recently. Of course, I’m always late on the trends, but it doesn’t mean I don’t feel compelled to contribute anyway (remember the “What I really do” meme a month or so ago? I made like, twelve of those before everyone told me to cease and desist.) What I also realized is that in all the time I’ve been doing P&Q, I’ve never disclosed a list of my favorite movies. So I’ve decided to do just that today, with a twist:
7. onlive (from Apps Store) As an Agent on the IOS system it has always been we couldn’t search the MLS…NOW YOU CAN….Thru this App!
11. Electric Land
Hope every one has had a wonderful holiday season, and all is well with every-little-thing!
2:48 - Find a baby turtle!
Despite the new retail development, it’s important that we continue to support our smaller, local independent shops.
Here is some inspiration from the talented Creative Card Crew.
Served with house-made tortilla chips (regularly $9.95)
Adoption is the perfect picture of God's amazing grace and love.
This KVM (keyboard, video, mouse) matrix routes any eight computers to any eight monitors with full cross-point capability, supporting resolutions up to 3840×2400. USB 2.0 peripherals are switched for each computer for keyboard/mouse control.
I made this tutu from a youtube video I found for one of the grand daughters already here. I know 2 of them will be finding out the sex of their child in mid August and early September. Not sure if the other one is going to find out or be surprised...either way I have been looking at videos for rag quilts and looking at baby material! It's a happy time here for sure. Hope all is right in your world and big hugs to you all!
* I’m a fan of Steampunk and Haywired has elements of the genre. Are you a fan yourself and have any Steampunk authors inspired your work?
The notion of “irreducible complexity” in a cell, as an argument against evolution, is beyond my present understanding. Knowing that life has existed on planet earth for billions of years, however, I suspect that there has been time enough for evolution, no matter how complex, with reducibility.
All interesting and valid questions. Do we choose to work together for the most basic building block of life? If we use vehicles like this one act play to encourage others to work together for change. My hope is to encourage people to research and learn about these things.
For those who are more adventurous and would like to try their own hand at making cleaners. I am giving away 2 copies of the e-book. All you have to do is go on over to The Peaceful Housewife look at her scents and them come back here and tell me what scent you would love to try in your house. This giveaway will be open until 9am Friday, September 9, 2011. I will be using Random.org to determine the results of the winner. Good Luck.
CD 2
Zetman (Episode 4) – Whoever the Sweeper is, you’ve got a new fan. Seeing him go around and kick ass like that, especially against the already overpowered beasts that are the Players, really excites me. I am excited to learn more about this character, how he operates, what his origins are, and how he will affect the series going forward. It will be especially interesting if he ever gets in a fight with Zet or Alfa considering he seems to be the most powerful being in the world at the moment and has an agenda that conflicts both our heroes.
The band is T Bird & The Breaks. They're a new, young Austin sensation that's, yes, another funk/soul outfit for your easy listening pleasure. (Has anybody seen that confounded bridge?)
9:30 a.m. – 5:30 p.m. May 9, 2011
Everything else means obvious things like personal hygeine and shopping, but also plenty of activities linked to the writing. It might be 6 hours per day, but that vanishes pretty quickly.
Nevertheless, now that my life is a little more settled, I'm going to try to start writing again.
And just in time for Christmas, too.
Those extra medical costs are partly born by the non-obese, in the form of higher taxes to support Medicaid and higher health insurance premiums. Obese women raise such “third party” expenditures $3,220 a year each; obese men, $967 a year, Cawley and Meyerhoefer found.
Between these two extremes, in turn, quite a range of potentially viable midpoints can be found, and of course that’s part of the point; a binary analysis allows for only two options, a ternary analysis for an infinite number between the far ends of a spectrum. Still, the options that are viable all share certain basic elements in common. First of all, they start from the realization that the material resources that support human life are finite, and can be exhausted if they’re used too greedily or treated too cavalierly. They recognize that too much is as problematic as not enough, that "longages" can be as destructive as shortages. Given the current and continuing trajectory of contemporary industrial civilization, they take it as a given that most resources are going to be in much shorter supply in the years to come, that collective institutions such as governments and markets—which are geared to the fantasy of perpetual growth—are unlikely to take useful steps until it’s too late to do much, and that individual action focused on learning to get by with much less is therefore essential to any viable path to the future.
Ok, right now, clear your mind of everything, tale a deep breath, and think for one moment: is this who I really am? Is this who I really want to be? Sometimes we may look at a famous player or an actor or a very good friend and think: I want to be like that. You may not realize it at that point, or you may not realize that ever, but from that moment onwards whatever you do, your subconscious mind will think about it from the angle of your role model. Keeping a role model is not a bad thing. It’s actually a very good thing. But sometimes people just tend to freak about it and go to extremes. You don’t want that to happen to you! Do you?
I was pleased to learn that a half cup of this juice is equal to one full serving of fruit - a stress-free way to help us meet her recommended daily intake of fruits and vegetables.
- Find yourself a wonderful BFE… you’ll know he’s the right one when he’s the only one you’d ever want in the hospital room with you as you’re sweating like a lathered racehorse and whimpering like a little b!tch.
Three little birds
“Reality is that which, when you stop believing in it, doesn’t go away.”
What kind of awesome crafty talents have you been gifted with?
it clear he meant business, though, by looking her directly in the eye.
Circlin' like a drunken hawk
I’m gonna come straight out and say it:
This is the final post for the yummy meal I made the other night. When I made the classic pesto it was specifically for this sammie. Now I am in love with homemade pesto and will never buy store bought again! Then I made the roasted tomato and pepper soup and realized I will never make canned cream of tomato soup again. With the fresh flavors and no cream, I just love a healthy version of my classic comfort foods!
Here’s a feature article on Widmer Hefeweizen on Beer Advocate. Ouch, “training-wheels beer.” That’s harsh. I like it and I don’t much go in for hefeweizen’s so I guess that’s me riding the trike.
among old
“They viewed me like I was from Mars because I wanted to play a boys’ game,” she said. “Even today there is a stigma, but it was much worse then.” The ideal time for children to begin playing chess is between ages 4 and 6, Polgar said.
Naman’s son, Jake, was one of the first students to walk out of auditorium when Savage began berating the Bible.
My rant is over. It’s not like I needed a female character to look up to anyway, because Robin from How I Met Your Mother was in it! Damn straight, and she was awesome. Me and Sunshine spent the first 10 minutes of the movie telling each other how much we want to be her. And she isn’t even posing as a super hero!
And yes, my friends. That takes planning.
Anyhoo, the Future Mrs Adventures and I were discussing such lists this morning. She asked if Kylie was on my list I said no (although I'm sure she's a lovely person) and told her there was only one person on mine.
markers (including natural killer cells, tumor necrosis factor, T-helper cells, and a variety of interleukins), and patient outcomes.
Fun fact: Roald Dahl, author of Charlie and the Chocolate Factory, was a great fan of “Prestat truffles,” a chocolate shop opened in London that is credited with bringing truffles to their current popularity in England.
In the name that is above every other name, by the time I see you again next month; you will be higher than where you are now in Jesus name.
The Following excerpts are from my Mirror Book. It is a journal of sorts that I use to sort out my spiritual struggles and journey. A lot will sound pretty normal and a lot will sound bonkers...kinda like me, I reckon....it's a longish post. Nobody says you gotta read it. :-)
This delightful red house below is a treasured Christmas gift from a dear friend.
Scary things, panels. They make you stand up and talk about stuff as if you're an expert. And you have to exude some kind of zen calm while you're doing it, and try not to sound like an idiot. Anyway, today I am at the 10th SCBWI UK conference in a dampish Winchester. And I talked about how, as an author you can sell yourself and your books on the internet. I think it went well (people said nice things, anyway). So, for those of you who couldn't be there, I'm going to put up my talk here in 6 easy-to-digest parts over the next few days. And for those of you who were there and didn't bother to take notes--well shame on you, and here it is again.
The public may well vilify these characters, but the ‘spend, spend, spend’ mentality that typifies their actions pervades Chinese society from top to bottom. A recent interview in the China Daily with pensioner Yu Ping commenting on how inflation has changed her life drives this ethos home. By no means a decadent big-spender, Ping talks about how the increase in prices and loss of interest rates has completely changed her attitude to money: “I used to love saving up, but money has become a lot less valuable in the bank,” she says. “So I figure I should spend it where it is needed and enjoy life.” Putting it bluntly, if even the lowliest of peasants wants to start dishing out the cash, then everybody else – all the way up the ladder from desperately poor to obscenely rich – will be wanting to do exactly the same.
So, I had intended my first goodness post to show up this morning, but apparently I can't distinguish between AM and PM in the scheduled post section. Please link up to the post below with your "goodness," anything heart-warming, fun, silly, or just plain ridiculous, to make us all feel warm and fuzzy.
soar like an eagle
I hear when love speaks my name
Most of us encounter these little delights in the form of their Greek cousin, Dolmades. However, these parcels of rice wrapped in vine leaves also appear in Iranian cuisine (and some other Middle Eastern cuisines) called Dolma. The term Dolma simply refers to something which is stuffed - in this case it refers to stuffed vine leaves. Eggplant, tomatoes, potatoes and many other vegetables can also be made into Dolma, simply by stuffing with a rice filling.
I never talked to Meck about his time with the Air Transport Command during World War II. When Meck and Bea starting sorting through their things in order to make a move from Long Island to Hawaii and Meck had a box full of WWII pictures on the curb for garbage collection I said “Are you sure you want to throw those out?” He replied “Yes”. I said “Maybe donate them to a historical society or group?” He said “No”.
This is eternal death, and this the torment long foretold.’
How film profits will be used in the end depends upon the assembled Bloggish people. I think one or two emigrants imagine that I will be some kind of leader but please understand that I have only ever wanted to be a facilitator. I would like to think that Blogland won't actually need a leader in the usual sense of the word. Besides, I'll be too busy playing beach volleyball, wrestling on the sand, drinking Tetley's bitter in the social club or kayaking beyond the reef to have any time left over to be a leader. Don't you think leaders are massively overrated anyway?
*-***: THE MATCHES OF THE NIGHT!!!!!!!!!!!!
There wasn’t a dry eye in the whole place.
Challenge 21: to post October 7
Non-violence in many ways is being practised by the Patriotic Front. I asked one of their commanders, Tongogara, what they actually do in Rhodesia, and he said they’re not doing much fighting, except when they are fired upon, or when the Rhodesian defence forces find them and try to run them out.
One can suffer
A voice that sang me random songs
The party has replaced her with Mr Kearney, a former journalist.
05. Pull Me Out Of It
Having said that, for now, I’m sticking with this one.
These are amazing beings in any reality. Their powers are mighty, and their beingness is mighty. Now, you have need to understand that the Godhead has surrounded themselves with the most beautiful, with the highest energy. And so, these are beings of adoration, and these are beings that you will often hear us refer to as those of the pink ray—it is pink-gold, actually. And their purpose is simply to be in attendance, in adoration. They are the singers of hosanna and praise.
1/2 to 3/4 tspn of saffron
Last, I colored the patches with a base of G12 and BG72 for the shadows. The flower is colored with E04 and the E44.
I immersed myself at work, and I'm doing better than ever. I had an excellent review, I'm being asked to write more and more regional and global stories, and I received news my company might send me to cover the ASEAN foreign ministers meeting in Bali next month. Perhaps it is true; when your personal life goes up in smoke, it's time for a promotion at work.
tilt
When the film was released some people had a problem with the ‘lying flashback.’ The Jonathan character relays a story to Eve which turns out to be a lie. Nowadays incorrect flashback is acceptable as even CSI uses it to portray theories, but at the time flashback had only been employed to show the gospel truth. This led many viewers to have little sympathy for the Jonathan character.
Here are all the sketchy details:
Ric Flair kicks the show off, ready to go….Wooooooooo
150g soft butter/oil, plus a bit extra
His glory fills the world Amen!
This is one of their best issues yet! And, I only say that because I'm in it. Kidding! Although, I am a bit biased given that I know/"know" others featured in this issue as well. Let's have a Rue Magazine roll call, shall we? (Pardon this interruption, but Fergus is destroying magazines behind me and this requires my immediate attention. He should know better in this house than to disrespect a magazine! ... Okay, now where were we? Oh, yes...)
This epic lie is the subject of “The Woman Who Wasn’t There.” One of the co-authors, Angelo J. Guglielmo Jr., was involved in the WTC Survivors’ Network and considered Head a close friend. He is also the director of a documentary by the same title, which debuted April 17 on the Investigation Discovery network.
As the closing Outro (Of Ancients, Gods and Us) departs the release leaves behind a depleted and thoroughly satisfied… one almost wants to say victim. From The Edge Of The Universe is an excellent release which though it will not find a welcoming home every where will more than give all those into inventive and experimental industrial, harsh ebm, and dark electro, a pleasing and intriguing time.
Also, she had septic shock. She almost died!!!! I almost lost my baby!!!! This is not something one expects to happen to their child. This is not something that we expected to happen with a child with Spina Bifida. We thought the only thing we had to worry about was the loss of function in her legs. Boy were we wrong.
For example, lesbian activist Virginia “Ginny” Apuzzo, a former Sister of Charity, has founded numerous homosexual local and national organizations including the New York City and the Hudson Valley Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual, Transgender, and Queer Community Centers and was Executive Director of the NY-based National Gay Task Force. She also served as Vice-Chair of the New York State AIDS Advisory Council, and was the highest-ranking gay or lesbian official to work in the White House.
I have read most of James Patterson’s books, like the Maximum Ride series, which I enjoyed immensely, and the Daniel X, which I actually found immensely boring. Witch and Wizard was a mix of both. The language in the books was intentionally using ‘teen’ language, which, I’m sure, was trying to make teens feel more comfortable, but actually made it very hard to read without getting quite frustrated.
I do not wish to wound any feelings, but all of us are aware of instances of active Latter-day Saint families who are experiencing difficulties with their children because mother is not where she ought to be—in the home.
Now the neighborhood kids joke,
Wednesday Night TV on ABC
Migrants of a different sort were asylum seekers, who arrived in considerable numbers after 1996, when 1179 applications were made. The annual number rose steadily before peaking at 11,634 in 2002. Most of the early applicants came from Nigeria, Romania and Moldova in that order. Asylum applications are now currently averaging roughly 4000 annually. While Nigeria still leads the way, significant numbers of claimants are now coming from Iraq, China Sudan and Pakistan. Many with children born in Ireland have been permitted to stay, and a factor in the decline in numbers applying, apart from a European-wide tightening up of controls on access, could be that children born to asylum seekers after 2004 do not qualify for automatic Irish citizenship.
As with much of Ulster military history there is heavy emphasis on the sacrifices the Inniskillings made on the Western Front and other theatres of the First World War. These include the struggle against the Ottoman Empire in Palestine and in particular the heroism of one Donegal Duffy from Gweedore who won a Victoria Cross for refusing to leave wounded men to die on the battlefield. Time and time again Duffy risked his own life to recover his injured comrades and carry them often on his own to safety. This was the final leg of a three day trip to Fermanagh and it turned out to be the most poignant. Why? Because only recently did I discover that my great grandfather on my mother’s side of the family was killed at the Battle of the Somme in 1916. Great Granddad Tommy Stewart’s death on the western front was all the more poignant because my mother and her siblings were brought up Catholics on the other side of the line from where Tommy grew up. He was a Shankill Road Protestant but his daughter Florence married a Catholic and moved with him to the republican Lower Falls. Such is the way our roots are tangled up, our ancestral ties complex.
Fourth: (tie) Seven Days in May/The Island of Dr. Moreau (a crazy, crazy, crazy movie that jumps the rails and doesn’t stop going—until it implodes: an unholy mess that I like very much. I saw this in the theater opening day, and I now own a copy of this outrageous movie. I also own Frankenheimer’s The Train—damn, that is probably one of the best action films ever made: they crashed genuine life-size trains! That’s madness! And awesome. Thank you, John Frankenheimer!)
These leader type-people don’t usually cry, or fall apart, or let themselves go…
(sniffle, sneeze, cough) I'm behind on my creating & posting because for a week now, I've been incubating the upper respiratory ick that everyone seems to have these days. The last 3 days have been miserable, but I am feeling a tad better and hope it's a sign that the worst is over.
for you spoke and all things came into being.
Some words really get on my nerves because their indiscriminate use has by now stripped them of whatever meaning they might have had in the past. The words sustainable and green - used with pseudo-ecological sanctimoniousness in every conceivable context - are currently my linguistic emetics. As far as I can see, the only remaining meaningful way to use these two words today is in advertisements like this one:
60 grams of Squire's Kitchen Sugar Florist Paste or Gum paste (No fondant!)
Cynjon Noah Welding. It's something that I've wanted to try my hand at for several years now, but has been put on hold until the house construction is finished. Priorities and all that jazz. There's just something appealing about large metal objects left outside to patina and age as they will...very tactile and visually pleasing to me.
#4 Thursday, June 9 – 7:00 ET – NBC – NBC Must See Thursday
But it is something that absolutely every British citizen who values human rights, democracy and the right to an open and transparent trial should be very very worried about. Because the whole sorry suggestion makes me feel pretty uneasy, and not a little hysterical.
I think his powerful motivation to be “cured” is relevant:
Fantastic introduction to the E.P, it’s full-on, intense and around 30 seconds in there is a moment of sheer anticipation. Lost Persona have a tendency to build-up to choruses and that little tradition is continued in this song with the song eventually growing into something powerful, tight and passionate.
To be continued….
It works way better for Billy to have maximum non-social space when he's in learning mode, but home schooling isolates us a bit in this regard. Even though we try to fit in a lot of playdates, there's nothing like that schoolyard for affirming, non-judgemental comparison. It's not like I definitively mark Billy's or my success and development against anyone else, but a bit of kid-focussed benchmarking is a great leveller.
Deal with it; in the end the whole world will be a mix, and race won’t exist.
List of available tours and walks in Eltham on 20 March 2011:
Just in time for the holidays, a lovely, little, Limoges giveaway!
But the FDA has never approved any non-prescription products for sexually transmitted disease, according to federal officials. Drugs are available for herpes, chlamydia, HIV and other diseases, but only via prescription.
a)old
Both images are meant to convey a sense of domination to the viewer. The viewer is left with the thought of, “If I wear Under Armour, I can beat my friends on the field.” The words “My Field” and “My Game” only help to further strengthen this message of dominance and ownership.
Last week, we had a couple of days of heavy rain, and one of those days also brought heavy winds in our area. Unfortunately, this meant that one of our Leyland Cypress trees in our backyard blew over, uprooted from the saturated ground at the roots. It is a sad loss for us, because the tree was one in a row of trees that we planted 8 years ago as a natural screen to provide some privacy in our back yard. Now we have a gap in that tree screen, and it will now look uneven and irregular even if we replace it with a large specimen.
This is the new trend in dispensing due process, in a declining western civilization where blood-lust suffices for justice.
seated alternating twisting dumbbell curls 50×12, 50×12
Boy, was I smiling when Charles recalls one of the first times he is waiting to meet Adèle in the church. He is sitting in the pew dressed up in unexpected garments. (p. 41)
I spent the last two years of my life managing a great independently owned beer bar chain in San Antonio and Austin, Texas called the Flying Saucer. The powers that be were always pushing us store managers to further our beer knowledge, to become more than just beer retailers and beer advocates, but rather to become certified beer judges and homebrewers, beer connoisseurs that could validate our establishment. When the Cicerone Certification program came along, they said anyone that took the exams would be paid for by the company. At the time, I had no idea what the program was, but I knew deeply as a beer server just how important it was. Any bar, any person, can pour a beer for someone. It takes a real understanding of where the beer came from, what type of glass to put it in, and most importantly the quality of the beer being poured and cleanliness of the glass it's being poured into to transform "any person" into a real craft beer advocate. I was up to the challenge.
GC: Can you tell us what your off-season plans are like in regards to getting in shape for another season of hockey?
2 bottles of beer
Coburg
It is the Easter weekend... the sun is trying to shine... and I am about to set the table for lunch and bring the cushions back out to cosy up the terrace in the hope of a sunny afternoon...
And I may not get this hat for Christmas..but you can bet it will be in my possession before Greg comes home and we take our big family vaca! Oh my, how I want this! From Marley Lilly also..can anyone tell I'm in love with this website?
Today we are all using Here's Lookin' At You. This is a perfect set for the men in your life. I have a nephew that will be graduating at the end of this month so I just took his school colors and made this simple card.
I'm bored with Fonetic Friday so I decided to do something different today.
A man with as many holes in his shoes as there are in his head
I think maybe the Koreans are making the best movies in the world these days. Or how about, they are making some of my favorite movies these days (OldBoy, Crying Fist, Welcome to Dongmakgol, JSA, Tae Guk Gi, Memories of Murder, Sympathy for Mr. Vengeance, Silmido).
The WHERE of planning may be a simple question to answer, but you’ll find that one simple question can spiral off in to many more. For example, when asking yourself (or your stakeholders) WHERE you should plan a meeting, you’ll also have to take in to consideration the WHO of your event.
Only 27 respondents to our poll had a favorable opinion of Georgiou and if anything they're Republican leaning- they support Heller 61-39 over Berkley and go for Mitt Romney 46-39 over Barack Obama. It's too small a sample size to make much out of but it would seem to dispel the notion that Georgiou running third party would be particularly bad news for Berkley.
Heat oil in saute pan and lightly caramelize garlic and chopped onions on medium heat. Add chopped chilli, chilli powder, salt and dried shrimp and stir well. Add in blanched broccoli pieces and adjust seasonings. Saute for 1 minute and take off heat. Serve as a side dish.
This is now my seventh post that I have written since beginning my internship. A little update on how things are going for me. I’ve been doing really well. I’ve been seeking healing in a few areas of life. I struggle with OCD. I have struggled with it for several years and just within the past year I’ve received a tremendous amount of healing from the Lord. I feel so much better. I’m still seeking full healing and I fully trust the Lord that He will not let my prayers go void! Another thing that I’m seeking healing for is depression. I’ve been on depression medication for a year now. It’s a constant struggle. I’ve seen a little healing but I will still trust and press in for healing!
Speaking exclusively to our correspondent, Engineer Adeola spoke on the Boko Haram issue, the present administration and other issues.
Let us guess that about half of the overhang is indeed within NAMA and therefore capable of sale on the basis proposed. That being so, the proposals would result in a reduction in NAMA debt of about €4.1b, that is, about 13.6% of the total amount currently owed by NAMA.
ah-choo
Normally, you'll find plenty of Louis Vuitton purses but to be real to you, it is advisable to acquire them only in the established sites of the brand and not from elsewhere. This is due to the coffee quality warranty, usually you may not even get yourself a louis vuitton utah leather pocket book composed of excellent natural leather excellent. At Louis Vuitton, you will discover dozens of pocket book styles for both ladies and men and now we actually liked the blend of lighting and black flavored coffee shade available as one with a great older go nonetheless it was for females only.
Tenebre (1982)
or then i thought it would be awesome to be a librarian or a museum curator or something for a day, not a specific person but a type of person.
not by salmon or trout
Toast walnuts in a dry skillet for about 7 minutes -- until you smell them releasing their beautiful oils.
35. HALLELUJAH - LEONARD COHEN (see 3 above!)
Now hear me out: I’m not trying to get down on myself. I know that perfection is unattainable, but understanding the realities of my conviction help me to grow…and so I’m sharing them with you.
But only you can choose
So, why do you read the books you read?
Excitement for the May 20 March on the NATO Summit in Chicago is building. Thousands of leaflets for the march have been passed out on the streets during a number of coordinated days of mass outreach. Outreach at many Chicago area campuses has been well received, especially at Harold Washington College, Truman College and Wright College and the University of Illinois – Chicago. Phone calls have come into the ANSWER Chicago office from all over the Midwest and as far away as Vermont.
Gracious Affections Intensify Spiritual Longing.
Expect more media attacks
Anyhow, one thing that I cannot stand about Pinterest is that every time someone "pins" one of your pins, you get an email notification. It's really annoying. I don't care who pins my pins so I don't need to know when they do.
At least I'm still in love with my story and my characters, and their love for each other. If I have such a pleasant time seeing Rosa and Baha together, living through their adventures, I simply have to make sure I write their story in such a way as to give everyone else that joy.
Double Chocolate Peanut Butter Anzacs! What doesn't a bit of chocolate and PB make better? Best idea ever right? Well to be fair, a few people still preferred the traditional version. But that's probably cos they're damn good too.
To answer that question we should look at what the ultimate aims of the ANC/Communists are. They want to rule forever. They want to get rid of all and any opposition that might ever prevent them from ruling forever.
Then during the Return period of my childhood, things became even worse. "She came back from that school with a rock hard butt. Go smack it. I'll hurt your hand." "Poke her butt and feel how solid it is." I just wanted to scream LEAVE ME ALONE, but I knew that would have its own issues to follow.
It begins today!
You can substitute “gas prices” or “foreclosures” or “student loans” or even “jobs” and see if Ann Romney might say the same thing.
1 ½ tsp. kosher salt
Being mindful requires we slow down long enough to experience the internal and external cues in our lives. The internal awareness is the music of our hearts, and it’s expressed through the outflow of our emotions.
The line-up is available below:
Congratulations Angel, hunnie!! We do hope you will want to join us for our next challenge in 2 weeks time. Please can you email me (Joanne) by clicking HERE so we can discuss the GD details further.
#1. She established a place of meeting in the center of the community (of Almere) without any specific religious significance. There people were able to connect with one another. It was called Inloophuis, which is translated in Dutch as a drop-in center. This was a ministry of presence, which invites people to be connected with others and if desired, with God.
Politicans in Washington, London and Paris should be proud. They got everything they wanted, and with no dirt under their nails.
A car wreck. Head-on. She died instantly, they said. It’s a small comfort to a man who still loves her.
Jaxon believes he is having a terrible nightmare until he finds an old friend and recalls how he died. Reality sets in and Jaxon begins to learn the rules of the strange land. He runs into a mean bunch of guys, an unlikely guide and... possible redemption. His quest is to find a certain young woman and steer her away from the path of Destruction that killed him. In doing so, he will need to face the wreckage of his past. Old temptations linger and Dark forces shadow his path. Jaxon has no idea his journey will take him to an abyss of his deepest fears.
The whole prize pack - the diaper, a bamboo insert, a microfiber insert, and a stay-dry doubler!
another like swirled chocolate
Why is it that when we go for ziarat, we pack all our old clothes?? Seriously, do we want to be going to the graves of our ideals wearing old trackie bottoms and tshirts with holes in them and scarves that have seen better days??
Licences often include improvements made subsequent to the effective date of the agreement. These improvements are usually the subject of a separate section of the agreement (discussed later).
In the 1980s the Thatcher regime sold the utilities and infrastructure of the UK. Arguing that it was not the job of the government to run utility companies, and that they would be more efficient under private control, the bonanza of privatisation was carried out. The constant rise in prices of the previously socialised utilities, have enriched the internationalist owners, but have not benefited the people one iota. Not only has privatisation led to higher prices, but also to worse services. This man-made drought is proof of the folly of selling the national infrastructure to rootless cosmopolitans who have no allegiance to people or country, and only see the financial profit to be made from raping the nation.
A customer comes in.
I really enjoyed putting this one together. Using the Cricut to cut the circles has made my life so much easier! Don't know what I did before welcoming that spiffy piece of machinery into my home! This card came together rather quickly, I hope you can see the detail on the antiqued copper brad (love them-- I'd put them on every card if I could!), the cocoa opaque gems and the chocolate grosgrain peeking out from the bloom! Oh! And check out that brightly patterned piece of "zip strip" running horizontally across the back. Those zip strips on the top of the CTMH paper are genius, giving you just a little more bang for your buck. I curled the message banner and popped it and the bloom using foam tape to give it dimension. Hope you like it!
I love reading submissions. I do it on the train in and out of work and often at weekends, because submissions are a treat. You never know what little gem you are going to uncover and what scary thing is lurking in the depths. So while I'm away, my submissions will remain untouched (because I read all my own). Hopefully a wonderful little story will come in while I'm relaxing, and I'll get to have all the fun of finding it when I get back!
13 The Wall Street Journal on power problems threatening India’s growth. Almost a decade ago, India’s government, seeking to overcome one of the biggest challenges to the nation’s development, set an ambitious goal: electric power for all by 2012. Instead, as the target date of March nears, the power sector is in shambles, and its dire state threatens India’s economic prospects at a time when a high inflation rate, a burgeoning government budget deficit and ripples from the European financial crisis are already damping growth. India is the world’s fifth-largest electricity producer after the US, China, Japan and Russia, but its per capita consumption is among the world’s lowest, at 778.71 kilowatt hours a year. Almost 300 million people don’t have access to electricity. The country needs a huge jump in supply to sustain its rapid economic growth, fight poverty and light the homes of those powerless millions.
Recently, executives and representatives of two world-class companies come to Cebu to introduce efficient and cost-effective business solutions, specifically on data management. APC by Schneider Electric and IP Converge Data Center Inc. (IP-Converge) jointly hosted executive and media product briefing; and also meet key business leaders in Cebu to introduce a ‘smarter’ data solutions that address the need for an efficient, cost-effective, and reliable management of data or digital resources.
Caught up with the girls (Leeann, Kate and Buck) hanging out in the lodge as I was getting ready to go. It was rumored that they were skiing, but….. And of course Buck gives me a present that I’m 9 days away from being able to use. I hope I didn’t loose it in my bootbag. I’m actually surprised she even trusted me after the meatball episode (a totally different story that we are not going to).
1.) Restrict Campaign Financing Donations to individuals and families and cap each at no more than $2,000.00 to $10,000 depending on their income and make such contributions non-deductible.
We live in a culture that so values goal-setting and achievement, that it's no wonder contentedness is barely on the radar, that my automatic response to the word has been a sense of dullness and disinterest. I mean, if you don't want anything, what fun is that? What would motivate you to get up in the morning and DO anything? Who would ever receive special recognition for how content they are?
And what is one of the hallmarks of the best sales people? Yep, listening…and whatever your “called” profession might be– sales, management, product or service, public or private sector, blue or white collar, profit or non-profit – you are selling!
It's a beautiful day here in Northern California, currently 63 degrees and sunny. Do I really want to leave this kind of weather for grey and damp? Probably. I decided to pull out the camera and have a little photo shoot at lunch. It was a bit disappointing, pictures I thought for sure were going to be great were more like ... meh. I look perhaps a dozen pics and of them, these 4 were salvageable.
If you take its 16 GB version of Wifi variant it will cost you Rs 30,500, as for 32 & 64 GB its price is Rs 36,500 & Rs 42,500. If you shift for its 4 G models than it costs Rs 38,900 for 16GB, Rs 44,900 for 32 GB and Rs 50,900 for the 64GB.
objects i am irritated immensely
"Cal Tjader-Last Bolero In Berkeley-1973 US":
For my first week without kids,
OK; I think I have found the perfect solution. Most of us now have decent laptop computers in our possession, and you can buy a small and relatively inexpensive (probably $60 to $80 U.S. dollars) USB TV TUNER. I have an HP Laptop with a Windows Vista operating system, and I was able to buy an HP USB Tuner designed to work with my operating system through Amazon.com (less expensive than buying it directly from HP, of course). The tuner (which is just slightly larger than an ordinary flash drive) came in small box complete with installation software and a miniature antenna (and a small remote control that I have not figured out how to use yet) – AND IT WORKED!
I remember the wrapper saying there were 90 cards in the set, 5 cards per pack. There were also stickers and puzzle cards. Here's what we got:
Effie is an old jade of 50 summers, Jessie a frisky filly of 40, and Addie the flower of the family, a capering monstrosity of 35. Their long skinny arms, equipped with talons at the extremities, swung mechanically, and anon waved frantically at the suffering audience. The mouths of their rancid features opened like caverns and sounds like the wailings of damned souls issued therefrom. They pranced around the stage with a motion that suggested a cross between a danse du ventre and fox-trot—strange creatures with painted faces and hideous mein. Effie is spavined, Addie is string-halt, and Jessie, the only one who showed her stockings, has legs with calves as classic in their outlines as the curves of a broom handle.
I can make choices though to handle these situations differently. How, you ask? Read below.
So, logically you must come to the conclusion that all of this is political hype and nothing more! And still no one wants to solve the actual underlying problem – SPENDING!!
Wednesday’s Results
08-04 Las Vegas, NV – Planet Hollywood Resort & Casino
The allegations have been made, the evidence presented in detail, and explanation of why an investigation into the 2006 election process is required has been provided to every State official that has the authority to act on it. No less than 138 copies of each complaint were mailed, each time. I have the postal receipts acknowledging delivery and acceptance, and those legislators that actually read these documents know exactly what these complaints entail.
As Psalm 1 says, delight yourself in His instruction. Take time every day to read His Word, think about it throughout the day, and let His Word transform your life. Follow Him.
With the technological development, and with the amount of time that people are spending working or at home in front of their screens (computers, televisions, smartphones, et al) people are becoming alienated, creating a distance in social and emotional relationships.
Here is a short video that I shot with my camera just under 2 hours later.
However, most people could not maintain such a monastic diet, so the next best thing is to accept guidance, especially for the first year
And finally, more caramel and more chocolate ganache (mud, if you prefer). I love the picture in the cookbook of the little girl looking completely entranced as she gazes at the cupcake she's getting ready to eat. We took a plate of cupcakes to our neighbors, who have two small boys. They looked equally entranced.
It’s thanks to Russell T Davies, the head honcho of the series, that it’s been so good, been written and made in such a full blown gutsy, hard hitting, clever, provoking and rigorous way. And the production team. What a team. RTD’s bold and un-dentable enthusiasm and self assurance in what he wants to achieve is a huge inspiration. He just knows what he wants to achieve and does it. Each episode of the series shines with this commitment and assurance and it’s a rare thing. Fourteen episodes a year of rigorously written creative television that is really, really different each week is not a mean feat. It’s always fascinating and challenging, whether it’s the Doctor’s insistence on giving any villain a chance to change their ways or the uncomfortable way that he has sometimes dealt with them - it has created splendid debate in my office and, I hope, in the playground too. The depth of life experience too. The horror of and the choices in war, the reality of relying on people, the Doctor and Rose’s friendship - the most platonic relationship ever portrayed. The madness of the Master. Donna’s desire for betterment. The acceptance of the diversity of life. What a smorgasbord.
A group of equally curious people from a nearby bar went out to investigate the then dark intersection where the explosion had occurred. One of the group members made the disgusting discovery of the electrocuted rat with its fur still smoking. Unfortunately around the very same time two vehicles collided in the darkness and hit several of the pedestrians. Sadly, one person died at the scene and five others were rushed to nearby hospitals …all because one rat randomly decided to play his own version of rodent Russian roulette.
I have to stop thinking that I am exhausted because it will make me even more exhausted...
Victorian women saved their hair in a small ceramic bowl with a hole in its top called a hair receiver. After accumulating a good amount of locks, the hair would be used to make a hair picture or bracelet. These hair crafts were the result of years of saving actual human hair.
I will have to e mail Royal Mail, nope, best hand write to them so miss the Governments super snoop spy’s who will be reading my e mails and laughing at my life ..
Truman had a strong convictions about what to do as president -- he saw himself as the heir and protector of the New Deal and internationalism and the mid-century Democratic coalition. He saw it as his duty to sustain the legacy. While the focus this gave him was sometimes effective, it often led him to strong fixed positions whether or not this put him in the best situation to influence policy.
Actually, that title sounds a bit naff, really, doesn't it? Apart from the bad grammar, it sounds like one of those statements axed X Factor contestants use when they claim "you haven't seen the last of me" and then end up doing nothing more than opening a new branch of Wetherspoons in Cleethorpes.
I’M GONNA DIE OF THE CUTENESS.
On Saturday we are going to my niece's Alli's 2nd Birthday party. The theme is Dora, so I know Melanie will love it. It will be fun I'm sure. I can't believe Allison is already 2 and Melanie is 17 months. Time goes by waaay too fast! Then Saturday night, Melanie is sleeping at Nanny and Papa's (my parents) because Brian and I have a wedding to go to. My friend from High School, Jessica is getting married. The wedding is at Heinz Chapel (Jessica and Pat met at Pitt) and the reception is at the Heinz History Center - That should be cool, never been to a reception there before.
He didn't reply.
KIM CATTRALL (Star Trek VI: The Undiscovered Country)
FFS get your priorities straight people.
thank you to all the invites we have received.
Per Damek's urging, we have semi-separated the chicks from the chickens. We integrated the two flocks last weekend and the chicks just can't seem to catch a break. There are 3 bullies in the flock, and that coupled with the fact that the chicks are petrified of coming anywhere near any of the big girls and thus don't seem to be eating or drinking much, we have been giving them time away for a good part of the day to be by themselves. Sooner or later they'll all get used to each other, but it was more than Damek could bear the other day when he went to feed all of them and witnessed the chaos. No blood mind you, just lots of chasing and occasional pecking.
The Senate can also be held up as an example of “do-nothing,” with the majority of the 87 votes on only three bills: highway (25), postal (16), and insider-trading (13). While Republicans sneer at Democrats for their inability to get anything accomplished, however, they neglect one fact. Whereas House Republicans need only a simple majority to pass a bill, the Senate is held to 60 of 100 votes to pass anything because of the Republican filibuster intransigence. Even so, the Senate Democrats have managed to get bills through recently: renewal of the Violence against Women Act, postal reform, a long-term renewal of the surface transportation bill, and one making it easier for companies to go public. Of course, despite passing the last of these, Republicans in the House plan to kill the others by voting against them or attaching damaging amendments to them. Congress remains at its infamous “gridlock.”
I will be taking photos and videos (because I'm pretty sure my lil bro and i are past due for another duet)
Forti’s Mexican Elder
On Wednesday, March 30th at 6pm
His fire for life is returning. I just hope it stays out of the back yard.
Flake-doves sent floating forth at a farmyard scare! –
The sleek Italian sports car belongs to Yazz School of Motoring in Slough, Berks.
And so far it has been fine. Except that I FORGOT to make the hat!! She started chemo in July, so she probably hasn't really started losing her hair yet... but I wanted her to have it beforehand. So now I'm RACING to get this hat finished and sent to The V-ster before she starts losing her hair. I was thinking about making one for my friend, also... because once her mom starts losing her hair, she's shaving her head. I like my hair too much (and Gzilla would kill me...haha) so instead I'm showing my support by making hats.
“How fast am I allowed to go?”
“Britain’s austerity experiment in particular has been judged by economists to have been ill-timed and poorly constructed at best. It is a reminder, in the consensus view, that the basic tenets of Keynesian economics – primarily, that government spending plays a key role in maintaining demand when the private sector is struggling in a financial crisis — remain as valid as ever.
As well as creating the illusion of texture in drawing, artists use the inherent qualities of a medium combined with other forms of drawing, such as smooth blending, rough shading, hatching or scumbling, to create extra interest inside of the work.
On her 14th day into the strike, Hana Shalabi is the second Palestinian prisonner to launch a hunger strike against "administrative detention." According to Adameer,
HSN junkies can be the first to order a special 2-disc bundle ($14.95) that includes Randy’s new “Anniversary Celebration” release and his best-selling Top 10 greatest-hits CD.
As you can see, along with my mother, my Singer 66K Lotus arrived today and, readers, it is gorgeous -- absolutely pristine. In fact, judging from the condition of the decals, it was hardly ever used. It turns smoothly and is free of grime and gunk.
Thirst bound
2. The Location. Hello?! You are standing in a bathroom! “I know the best place to show off my knitting! Bathrooms just scream beautiful, natural and hand crafted!” said nobody, ever. Seriously, wake up and smell the…umm…toilets? Okay, minor rant over. Bathrooms are usually very small (especially in England) which means you will almost always be standing far too close to the mirror (this may also be because you are trying to capture more detail). Shots that are taken close-up, as opposed to shots that are merely zoomed in, often feel quite claustrophobic to the person looking at them. It is hard to focus on certain parts of the knitting, and you naturally try to lean back to remedy this (which doesn’t work). Very few mirrors are ‘perfect’ mirrors, most of them have imperfections which cause House of Mirrors effects; bits of the knitting are stretched out and some are squashed, etc. Having the camera that close to the mirror also has the side effect of making the photo fuzzy and out of focus, which again will lose you detail.
Hard the breathing rattles, quite glazed already the eye, yet life
In stage 15 of the world’s most famous bicycle race, Andy Schleck was wearing the yellow jersey (as the overall leader) when he and last year’s winner, Alberto Contador, were trying to outclimb each other on the final mountain climb of the day.
Ok, the man is a gem, but really, I've had it with that freakin couch, and I think he's finally seeing the light. Oh, did I mention it has matching loveseat?? The entire livingroom is consumed by hunter green damask. I'd rather sit on milk crates at this point.
Like many parents, I was overwhelmed with well-meaning "advisers" throughout our pregnancies and infant/toddler years. Since most of our friends and family at the time were products of traditional parenting, most of the advice we received was in-line with the common views of the time. We were told all about the benefits of circumcision, and cribs, and the importance of babies crying it out, and how to choose a day care provider so Ginger could go back to work. It was easy to listen to that advice, nod politely, say "thank you", and then reject it out of hand. There were other tidbits of wisdom, however, which were a bit more difficult to simply dismiss, because I simply could not understand where they were coming from. These ideas were less about what to do and how to do it, and more about what to feel and how to feel it. I have always rejected the notion that someone else could tell me how to feel about something, and this was no exception.
2) Blend together in a blender, tea and rice.
Set in the 1300s in England, this re-telling of Beauty and the Beast will capture your attention and your heart. Annabel is the main character, forced to be an indentured servant to Lord le Wyse or marry the foul Baliff Tom, a friend of her father's, who instills fear in her. She chooses to be a servant to the Lord, even though others have claimed he is accursed and a beast. Lord Ranulf le Wyse is the other main character, scarred from an accident when he was a teenager. His outward scars however, are not nearly as bad as the scarring of his heart. Will Annabel be the one to soften his heart of stone?
6. On Tuesday, I got a chance to mix things up with some new exercises that wore me out really fast but were lots of fun. I love adding variety to my workouts!
Love; oh love you I do!
I'm on a bunny high after getting this card from Aunty Jan! Don't you just love the bunny washi in the background? I think that is one of my all time favorite washi paper in my collection. So much so, that I bought several versions of the same washi in different colors while in Japan!
Thankfully, the Bayou Teche looks a little better now that a budding daredevil’s errant four-wheeler has been fished out six miles down the bayou from the brewery.
To Our Outstanding Reign,
* I could only count movies I've seen, and the movies that live in our home (and thus could remind me of their existence) had a much better shot of making one of the lists.
As the whites appear to be primarily junior foot soldiers in such gangs, those who have become involved in such crimes could well be more representative of the effect which exposure to black culture can have on impressionable white boys, rather than evidence of a similar propensity amongst the white community.
Actually, she'd much have preferred what actually happened, which was that Al moved in (having redecorated and removed much of the furniture) and he and his family still live there. She'd love that, far more than having all her things still there gathering dust nine years on.
Venue: 93 Feet East, 150 Brick Lane, London, E1 6RU 020 7247 3293
Wintercoats dumped as we moved to Kenya, we'd opted not to fork out £400 on warmish coats for the three of us to wear during this week alone. But as we shivered, bejacketed but coatless, in the drizzle, round Northern split sites, we'd guess they wondered quite why we were so idiotic. Martyrs to fashion if not to commonsense.
*I have also had the opportunity to read 2 books, Betty White's new one (that women is a LEGEND!) and Are You There Vodka? It's Me Chelsea. Damn that girl is funny! Completely inappropriate, but so damn funny! I was laughing out loud!
In a later post I will go into more detail on all of the Empowerment Gifts of the Spirit (as distinguished form the Sanctifying Gifts on which I have already posted some articles). Right now the emphasis of this article is to advise you as to the importance of “praying in the spirit” and why there is such a need to accept and exercise this gift for our personal edification and for the good for the community.
I realise that this is a fairly common thing to most who become a parent, but if you are not, you might not have looked at it like this.
UPDATE: 22nd February, 2011. The Independent reports on proceedings in the High Court yesterday. The judge, Mr Justice Frank Clarke said that the examinership would end on Friday 25th, February, 2011 at 2.30pm (Day 164 of the examinership) unless there was an appeal. The judge stated that Oak Tree Capital had engaged in an abuse of court process by increasing its financial injection offer by a reported €6.6m after the court had made its decision. What next? An appeal by McInerney is a possibility or if examinership is allowed to expire on Friday it is likely the banks will seek to appoint a receiver.
Ever since a purse like this was featured on the Spellbinders blog (click HERE to see it) I have wanted to try one. I had to come up with my own dimensions by trial and error because I used different dies than the instructions. The paper is from The Paper Studio Uptown Flair stack. I used the three largest sizes of Spellbinders Grand Nestabilities Labels 23 for the base. Since there are three layers, the purse is nice and sturdy. I used Spellbinders Grand Labels 4 for the top.
It’s a very strange experience sometimes. I could be in Spain for instance. The next day I’d be back in the UK. 2 days later Italy…. Different languages, different rules and regulations.
So I'm considering dropping of the face of the planet (aka internet) until I have finished. Obviously I can't do that entirely, because obviously I have obligations with my new website (which holy $h!t got 100 visits yesterday *passes out*) but I think I may need to take a small break from my casual/recreational internet follies. (I know I know...I cried too!)
When EMLA’s clients release a new book, the agency wishes the book “into readers’ hearts.” I’ve loved this image. The wish can come true only with books that readers can absorb wholly, can claim as their own, can hear them whispering just to them. These are the kinds of books that EMLA represents, almost as if this is the criterion. I have confidence that my EMUs Debuts siblings’ books meet it.
The Thick of It book
So here’s a question for you, my blog readers. Would you like me to repost some of my SBR reviews? Just to keep things fresh and moving while I’m busy with other projects. I do have to warn you, we’re constrained to 200 words, so some of them are a little shorter than my normal reviews.
Two of the hallmarks of farm murders in South Africa during the last ten years have been the horrible torture perpetrated on many of the victims and the sadistic cruelty to animals which is reminiscent of the Mau Mau terrorist campaign in Kenya in the 1950's. The sheer savagery of the extremely brutal attacks include: an elderly farmer whose head was opened by an axe; a lady of 84 who was repeatedly raped; a year old baby set alight; farmers strangled, garrotted; mutilated, dumped into boiling water, suffocated, slashed with pangas, repeatedly stabbed, tortured with a heated iron; etc.
Ok, confession time. Yes, I disappeared. For a year. That has to be a new record, even for me. I never *ever* expected to neglect the blog for this long -- it kind of just got away from me there. What started as being busy with spring yard work and house stuff turned into a crazy emotional year that had me grasping to keep my head above water even to be able to get out of bed in the morning. What am I talking about? Well, here's what the last year's involved for me:
Now, let us unpack two things here. Firstly, there is a distinction drawn between everything you have paid in to your pension (and employer contributions) up to last month, and everything you are going to pay in (and the employer). Secondly, there is information about how these two different sets of contributions are going to be dealt with in your retirement. Nowhere does the leaflet give you any examples of this, or offer the calculating formula.
my good friend randel plowman is a collage artist extraordinaire. i have been fortunate enough to take his collage workshop for the past two summers and encourage you to watch his blog for information on future workshops and exhibits. www.acollageaday.blogspot.com. check him out. wander through his extensive archives fpr a real treat. his bird collages are especially popular.
overleefden de rampe en bleven gespaard
denial of adequate medical care.
A children's charity worker from New Brighton appeared in court today facing a string of sex assault, child porn and violence allegations.
I have again visited David Austin Roses with another dear friend and took a few photo's to share with you, but I'll let you into a disappointing secret - as it was such a nice day I was expecting the air to be sweet with the gorgeous scent of the roses, most of which were blooming their heads off but it seemed that few had any scent and then you had to literally shove your nose into the bloom to 'get it'. Anyhow, here's the pictures.... Don't forget you can click on any photo to expand them.
follow our guidelines!
The next presenter is Karen, the other active Sales Associate in our office. The shift in presentational mannerisms should come as a shock. In fact, between Karen, Greg, and myself, the one take away I assume our audience will have is that there isn’t any one way to carry yourself. Style is something that has to be figured out on your own.
I just want to encourage you ladies out there that are still waiting on a husband. He is so faithful. I gave my future husband to the Lord years ago after getting my heart broken. I asked Him to keep all men from pursuing me until He was ready to bring the right man into my life. For five years not a single guy pursued me! There were so many nights I thought maybe He had over done His end of my request. But one day God brought a man into my life who was bound and determined to win my heart. And he did.
Thursday, November 17th - Thanksgiving Breakfast
This is a very simple project using the following a twig tree, silk roses, painted wooden hearts in red and white, valentine's ribbon, red bows, and tin hearts in red and white. (Floral wire, wire cutters and hot glue gun not shown here).
If songs still came embedded in scratchy 33 1/3 rpm disks, with full-size graphics and lyrics, I wonder how music might affect me now. Would it still encourage me to dig deeper within myself? To try to connect with others through their musical words? To live fully--for a few moments--within someone else's soul-searching short story?
I made it home! What a whirlwind trip that was! I was so excited to visit with everyone, meet the twins girls my dear friend had in January, shop with my Mom, and have a special surprise-ish visit with my sister who regularly resides in South Korea.
EDIT: I do have the code, I'm just a moron, and lost the email. But I found it now, so you are able to sign up below, if you like.
—Interview with Cynthia Leitich Smith
Any feedback positive or negative on the website is welcome! Hope you enjoyed it!
Flowers and leaves cut from the paper and inked
Reading period for Series 1 brackets in Round 2: June 5th-June 18th
I am so thankful that Jeff finally got to meet her and can't wait until the 6 of
Thing to wear: I pretty much live in dresses and flats -- my favorites are Milly and DVF, I love Tory Burch and Miu Miu for flats, and of course a good pair of Jack Rogers... I am from Florida after all!
16.Are retainers encouraged and how does morale work?
As mentioned above, some companies you apply to might require a Bachelor's degree or college diploma and some might not even tell you up front that this is the reason you are being rejected. If you haven't achieved this level of education and feel like it's holding you back, you can do something about it. If you have a job, furthering your education through evening classes or online university training can be difficult to balance but it can be done. The long-term positive impact on your career can really make it worthwhile, too.
Medium consistency is used for stars (with the star tips), figure piping, borders (like the shell border) and flowers with petals that lie flat. To make medium consistency frosting, add one teaspoon of water for each cup of stiff frosting, or one tablespoon if you want to make the full recipe medium consistency.
The next clue came when I started trying to train her. I am no stranger to training dogs - much of my childhood was spent working with various canines because I lacked the social skills to interact successfully with people. With so many years of experience behind me, I was sure that training this new dog would be a very simple task.
Listening: Pearl Jam, Counting Crows and Death Cab For Cutie
Andy Hibbert (Captain)
The Brinker International Forum series attains to be “ENTERTAINING. THOUGHT-PROVOKING. AWE-INSPIRING.” and last night it accomplished that once again. Roz Savage’s story spans our world’s oceans but touches upon so much more. Click thru for our recap of last night and a preview for the rest of the 2012 Brinker International Forum series.
I can't decide on the size I want...I figure I will get one of the canvas scrapbooks that has the good page protectors and then I can just add what I need.
from top to bottom are shots from the same week of march for the last six years. in the first shot i have not yet decided that i wanted to persue photography - i knew i loved it, but this was taken with a now archaic kodak point and shoot. because photographs were placed in our company's reports to the banks, the resolution was quite small. i do remember this shot as it is one of the most beautiful sunset's i've seen from one of the most beautiful cities i've visited. it's taken at the end of one of the piers on alaskan way in seattle, washington. the restaurant was wonderful, the food was fantastic, and i loved it.
I blogged in detail about this a few months back, and here's a follow-up. People (including me, until recently) seem to think that being an artist is a little like being a paranoid schizophrenic. You're born that way and there's nothing you can do about it, but with lots of meds and a decent institution, there's still hope of an okay life. More likely, you'll end up ODing at 27 in a basement green room, having spent your twelve illegitimate kids' inheritance money on hookers and blow.
then this might be awkward.
Why did those first psychiatrists write a report that was completely wrong?
